# 1	Week4
## 1.1	Introduction
Hi.  
I am dr.  
Haley and welcome to my path of teaching, my teaching will cover three session.  
There are introduction to distribution Network, low-carbon Technology, and method for integration of low-carbon technology.  
In the first session, we will be looking at the overall structure of electricity.  
And a distribution Network and their main components, including voltage level network, configuration, load the profile characteristic low-voltage, Network design and voltage, drop calculation.  
This form the basis for all late analysis, in this unit.  
So it is important to digest the material before moving on.  
In this session, I will cover five topic, electrical distribution system, and network overhead, line and cable, and networker configurations.  
Load of profile characteristic load of voltages, Ein regulation.  
And the voltage drop calculation.  
First of all, it is important to understand the difference between Distribution Systems and network.  
We will then look different network configuration and discuss their plone and combs.  
This will form the basis of for the understanding reason, why low-voltage Network often using radio or open ring configuration.  
Since the network load profile are stochastic in nature.  
We will exam, the typical load profile and a characteristic and their impact on low voltage in Lego work design, we will also introduce the basic are going to get the load concept such as after diversity, the maximum demand a DMD method, which you can be used to carry out to design Urban No location Network.  
We will then look low voltage Network design, requirements and procedures.  
It is important to know the voltage, ER Star Chili limits at the network, different network of vulture level.  
We will detail the row of voltage regulation to play in the low voltage Network design.  
In order to assess the level of integration of low-carbon Technologies, such as soloing Generation, electrical vehicle, heat pump Etc.  
It is important to appreciate voltage, drop of calculation through some exercise.  
Finally, this textbook and the reference are used in this session.  
Electricity, distribution Network, designed by lack of e and Home in published in 1995, electric power, distribution system.  
Designed by Golden in 2008, load the profile in UK can be found in Acts on website and Network associate King can be found in its website.  
UK statuary instrumentation document with the publication.  
Number 26 is 5 it is about the electricity safety quality and a continued 80 regulation publishing 2002 British standard Iain 50160 publish.  
In 2010, it is about voltage, characteristic of electricity, supplied by public electricity Network.  
Thank you very much for watching this video.  
I will see you in next video.  

## 1.2	Power Distribution Networks
Welcome to this video.  
Giving a brief overview of electrical power distribution Network.  
This slide is revising how the traditional power system, deliver the power to the customer.  
The power is generated from the power station.  
Is then transmitting to distribution Network and the customer through transmission Network such as National Grid, the boundary between transmission Network and distribution network is so called grid Supply Point.  
GSP in distribution Network, heavy industry, customer are often connected The power flow from a tree network 2mv network, through primary substation and the powerful from MV Network to LV Network through secondary substation.  
Industrial customer are normally connected to em V Network, while home and Business, and a commercial, customer all connected to LV Network.  
The power flow is one the rationale for long generation and network customers.  
This slide is the graphic view of electricity power system power from generation.  
Two transmission network of 400 KV or 275 KV through a step up power transformer.  
Power delivery from transmission Network 400 KV or 275 kv2 distribution Network through Step Down Transformer.  
Add GSB, substation, the power delivery, customer VAR M.  
V-Network 33, KV 11, KV or six points.  
6 KV 2, LV Network, 240 volts.  
This slide show the UK conventional, electricity value, Ching, larger scale, traditional generation such as stocks and a thudding.  
Electricity SSE, Scottish Power along eccentric EDF, Etc.  
transmission Network, including National Grid, SSE scholarship, our energy Network Northern Ireland, electricity distribution Network, or the annerose, such as electricity, Northwest, limited ssee, Northern powergrid, Western power distribution, Northern Ireland, electricity Etc, the service or supplies, Adding Empower EDF, be long, esse procedures, Etc.  
UK customer have a t-38 percent domestic.  
30% industry, 3%, transport, and 29% others.  
This slide show the UK context for distribution Network.  
There are nine, distribution, Network, operator, SSE scholarship, our and G network electricity.  
Northwest Northern Ireland, electricity Network, Northern power grid scholarship, our energy Network in North Wales, Western power distribution.  
UK power Network Scottish and Southern in south.  
UK, perhaps is the most competitive electricity Market in the world business is regulated by of Jing UK government body asset, including 132 KV H VM V + LV.  
Accounted for 50% of The value of VG U GB, electricity Network, a significant part of the asset installed during nineteen fifty.  
And sixty this imply the network at aging is one of the big issue This slide shows the difference between distribution system and Network electric distribution system, including generation and transmission network with voltage 400 KV or 275 KV in distribution Network.  
Different voltage level changing through primary substation or secondary substation voltage level are 132 KV 33, KV 11 KV and 6.6 KV low-voltage Network three-phase, poor Mountain Transformer.  
11 KV to 400 volts.  
Or in single phase three 230 volts, finally customer and load.  
Distribution Network including primary substation.  
Primary Transformer, primary feeder secondary distribution, whole Mountain, Transformer, low voltage of feeder, service needs, M and load.  
As can be seen that the difference between distribution system and distributes that will ease the former including the generation or power source.  
This slide show a typical UK distribution Network as can be seen from the figure transmission.  
Eh V is greater than 300 KV such as 400 KV.  
In the UK HV is between 36 KV +, 300 KV, such as 275 KV and 132 KV in the UK.  
Distribution.  
MV is the between 1 KV +, 36 KV such as 33 KV, 11, KV 6.6 kg and a low voltage is below.  
1 KV such as zero point, 4 K, be hitting the UK distribution come.  
Analogy is e HV.  
HV, m, v LV L.  
HV, is most likely, meshed, and we P & L V can be ring and a radio.  
As we know this unit is about smart grid, this mean, we need to integrate low-carbon technology.  
Not only renewable energy sources such as wind and solar farm at MV level but also low-carbon generation and loathe at LV.  
This slideshow, this low-carbon technology are mainly connected to the distribution Network at the MV and LV.  
She Network.  
This is another view of transmission Network, heavy industry.  
Such as real ways, Supply primary substation, 33 KV Wind Farm is also connected to MV.  
Domestic customer are connected to the network via the local of secondary substation.  
This slide show today a future smart grid.  
It can be seen that the day network is on responsive generation and demand in one way flow and no storage.  
The future network will be connected EG and electrical vehicle and electrical heat pump to all voltage.  
Level from ehv.  
HV m v, + LV.  
The most importantly, the future network is active responsive Demand with energy storage technology.  
To achieve this.  
The following issue will be considered this including energy Supply security, network aging assets cost of new technology, Mark the value chain.  
And a most improbable, the people participation to the changes This slide will mainly look the challenge in LV, distribution Network voltage rise due to PV panel, job due to EV thermal limits are the wire fit for the purpose.  
More unbalanced, Etc.  
Engaged to be distribution Network 11 KV and 33 KV voltage arise due to wingpower Rule Network increase in short, circuit level Urban Underground.  
Power quality are lending and potassium increase energy losses, variability in ehv distribution Network.  
The thermal limits stability Reserve require and very real ability to address this issue and the challenge we need Network opposite.  
Availability controllability, voltage, man.  
And Thurman for management and integration solution.  
Thank you very much for watching this video.  
I will see you in next video.  


## 1.3	Network Lines and Configurations
Welcome to this video.  
It is about voltage line cable, and configuration.  
This slide show that varies LV overhead line and underground cable where the use of all headline or on the ground cable will depend on the decision based on planning mentholated and the area of Rue and Technical aspect and a cost commonly in lieu area.  
Overhead line are often used as it is cheaper than on the ground Cable in urban.  
An area, depending on Country region on the ground cable are often.  
Considered these slides show, the cost ratio comparison between on the ground cable, and overhead line.  
At each voltage level as can be seen, the cable cost is more expensive than overhead line.  
Normally, five times more expensive in urban area.  
For LV Network, it also, The percentage of circuit kilometers of overhead line and underground cable in England, as can be seen that the percentage on cable of LV network is a very high about 37% in compare it with nine point eight percent overhead line, 0.3% mixed overhead line.  
And the cable this slideshow, that LV overhead line can be Scene in Tokyo City, in fact, such overlying picture can be seen in many Old City around the world.  
This may be due to the cost to Digger unknown conditioning in a well built up area in Old City.  
This slide show don't turn green, substation estoppel.  
It is supplied as small residential area in Greater Manchester the right side of pictures show.  
How complex of LV Network can be this size.  
Show six secondary substation spread over the greater Manchester region.  
There are landgate and sage green ink, Northwest Howard Street in North downtown green and green side at open show in south east and Lester Avenue in all training at South West.  
There are different complexity and topology of LV Network, among these six.  
Secondary substation.  
The network in Lion, gate is a symbol than the others as 80s less popular residential area.  
We will see later that the cable size and loading characteristic in this area are are very different.  
Hence the level of integration of renewable, Aging and low carbon load to each LV Network can be very different.  
Slide eight and nine.  
Show five different network configuration, there are matched Network link Arrangement and with open Point interconnected Network, open loop and Radio Systems.  
For the mesh Network, it is more reliable, but more lying and a more complex protection scheme and the low asset utilization.  
However, it has increased security of Supply.  
It is a frequently used in transmission Network, easy to extend.  
But at the my result in a higher losses, Link Arrangement at the has open point the system operate as a radio, the supply can be restored after loss of one in feeder it's a common practice in distribution Network.  
This configuration is more reliable, less asset, and abet asset utilization that matched Network.  
It is the Simplicity in topology and protection.  
And less expensive.  
Interconnected network of provide redo reduction of total transfer capacity.  
It could accept a loss of one in feeder.  
If it is iron, is to do.  
So the fault level, the voltage, level and react.  
The power might be a problem.  
Reverse power flow might be occurred during false, it is not common in distribution Network.  
However, it is a highly reliable.  
Viable, it is very expensive, low asset, utilization and complex protection and voltage, regulation will be required.  
This slides cover the open loop and a radio network configuration.  
The open loop is common in distribution Network during normal operation condition.  
It operates as a radio, after isolating, a for Section.  
The open point is close to provide backup Supply.  
It has a simple protection and also cheap but it is less reliable.  
Reduce system is a very common in rural area, distribution network but no backup Supply.  
It is cheapest simplest but at least reliable configuration.  
This slide show a simple topology of a distribution Network, in mashed, and a radio network configuration is network.  
Configuration in HV is 132 KV and MV 33.  
KV network is a simple mesh Network, which provide M minus 1 reliability, however, and we add 11 KV and LV, add 400.  
V that work.  
Our radio network which is no backup.  
If any long is failed, this slide show a simple topology of Distributing that occur in mesh and ring network configuration in hve.  
132 KV and envy 33 KV not.  
Okay, is also simple mesh Network which provide own -1 reliability at MV 11 KV.  
The configure is open ring.  
Aqua is normally operate as radio, but it is, any long is fellow the network configuration to a remote, the phone line section, the network is still operate as radio network for LV at the net 400 volts.  
The ring configure is not in common, however, it may have the potential to improve the integration of renewable generation.  
And low carbon load which has investigate through smart Street project in summary, the use of overhead, lowering, or underground cable, highly dependent on technique economic and planning requirements of a given area cost practice and the usage of giving Network.  
Topology is also depend on Technical and economic Requirements, the ability to restore the power supply after four is the key as backed.  
Thank you very much for watching this video.  
I will see you in next video.  

## 1.4	Load Profiles and Load Characteristics
Welcome.  
In this video, we will introduce the concept of load profile and various load characteristic.  
After this video will show be able to use collector load profile calculation formula for the network design.  
In the UK, a lot of profile presents of the pattern of electricity usage by day.  
And by a year for the average customer in one of eight profile class also called PC profile class, 1 and 2 are for domestic Primacy and class 328 for non-domestic premises Extra long, a console company, they do balance and a settlement in Great Britain.  
Create a profile for each of this profile class by randomly select the site and installing half hour meter at decide.  
This data is seen as a preventative of all meter in this profile class.  
So more information you can see from ww extra-long dot 0, dot U k--.  
This slice detail, the eighth load of the profile class pc-1 is domestic on.  
Restrict customer PC2 is domestic, economic seven.  
Customer PC3 is non-domestic on received restricted.  
Customers PC for is the non domestic economic 7 customers.  
BC 5 6, 7 and 8 on Long domestic maximum demand, customer with Peak load factor of less than 20% or between 20% and 30% or between 30% and 40%, and over forty percent respectively.  
This ratio, the typical demand of single household with, with three people's in weekend, weekday in March with measurement in minutes by minutes, it was generate by using Central for Renewable Energy System.  
Technology also called crash demand model which can be found in the rough / University website.  
As you can be seeing in the peak load, our occurred randomly, if consider 100 customer in LV network, will all this customer have the same power Peak simultaneously.  
Certainly, they will not otherwise, the network loading will be a problem.  
Hence, we normally consider aggregate load for a network, which will be discussed later, This slide shows the overall profile of a network with 1.9 million PC.  
One customer blue color curve, and 0.2 Milling.  
PC2 customer presented red color, curve, respectively.  
Clearly, pc-1 peak of happen in the morning, between a.m.  
to 10 a.m.  
and the evening between P.m.  
and 8 p.m.  
while PC to Peak is happened between 2 a.m.  
to 4 m.  
This slide show the average of diversify coin sun' demand profile for 1.9 million.  
Pc1 & 0.2 PC to customers.  
It can be see although only 0.2 Milling PC to customer but they are average.  
Diversify coincident demand profile with the peak is about 1.2 kilowatts Which is higher And the Peak at about zero point four, kilowatts for 1.9 million PC.  
One customer this is because PC2 customer is unlikely switch on their domestic economic 7 device.  
During the specific time between a.m.  
and 7 a.m.  
simultaneously ypc.  
One customer device are more widespread The diversity coins in the load, is the total expected load to be draw during a peak period by device or system of a device.  
Coincident.  
Peak demand is the energy Demand by a group During the period of peak system demand Loosely speak.  
It is referred to demand among a group customer that coins in the day with total Demand on the Them at that time.  
This one is clearly qualified, the demand and demand interval.  
The demand is the load at receive terminal average over the specific interval of time.  
The command interval is the period of which the load is average.  
The period, maybe 15 minutes, 30 minutes or 1 hour, this demand statement should be expressed demand interval.  
The selection of both time, interval and a total time is arbitrary.  
This slide show The Daily demand variation law curve.  
It can be seen that the peak is 0.98 per unit when the demand interval is Select at 15 minutes.  
However, if the interval is selected as one hour, the it'll result in to 0.88 for per unit, this indicator, the sampling rate for loaded demand.  
Curve is also One of the important parameter in order to model the load, more accurately.  
This raised a challenge for the measurement at higher sample rate due to the higher cost.  
A loaded duration.  
Curve is used in electricity power, generation to illustrate the relation between generating capacity, requirement, and the capacity utilization.  
The load duration curve is similar to load code, but demand date is in order descending, the order of magnitude rather than Penkala, knock, they go like the red color curve teller use of generation capacity.  
Utilization is better than the blue color curve.  
The slides 11.  
And 12 introduce some important concept for loading coyotes in this size.  
Maximum Peak load Advanced is the greatest of all demand which have occurred during a specific period.  
I eat the daily.  
Weekly cetera Diversified coins and demand is the demand of composite group of Somewhat unrelated to load over a specific period of time.  
Please note the maximum diversity.  
Demand is important for planning.  
The demand the factor or DF is a ratio of Maximum demand of assistant to the total connected load of the system demand.  
In slice 11.  
If the load curve, our aggregate the system load, curve can be developed.  
I'm resident, Urban residential plus rural residential Road, + Lu Commercial Road, plus Commercial Road, and in class industrial load and a plus other load, and the plus losses equal to system load.  
The load of factor is the ratio of average load over a desired period of time to the peak load.  
I occur on that period load of factor.  
Is often less than 1 Positive factor is the ratio of sum of individual maximum demand or various subdivision of assistant to the maximum demand of the whole system.  
There is a factor is often great than one the coins and factor is the energy related to the term.  
It is the ratio of the maximum coincident total demand of a group of the customer to the sum of the maximum power demand of individual customer.  
This factor is normally less than 1.  
Load losses factor is a factor that when the mouth / energy losses at the time of the peak and that the number of loader period will give overall average of energy losses.  
It is the ratio of average power losses to the peak load power losses, during a specific period of time.  
This is example, one is to calculate average annual power losses, and the total annual energy, losses, assume that a new Peak load of a primary feeder is two thousand kilowatts measure by our lay, at which power losses are 80.  
Kilowatts assume the annual losses factor of 0.15.  
The answer is, the average power is equal to power losses at the peak load X and you loss of factor equal to 8.  
Tikal was multiplied 0.15 equal to 12 kilowatts.  
The total annual Los Angeles is equal to average power losses X and U in our equal to 12.  
Know what x 8760 hour per year, which you give 100 000 0.01 hour? This example, two is to calculate the diversify demand for a group of six houses as shown in figure at end of lateral, line, l42 in feeder, for connector, six residential customer wide distribution.  
Secondary Transformer, assume that the connected load is nine carat words per house and that the demand Two, e's 0.65 and the diversity factor.  
For the group of six house is 1.1.  
the first way we calculate the demand factor, which is equal to maximum demand over the total connected demand Things that the diversity factor is equal to total number of connected demand, multiply the amount of factor over the diversity, the bound of the group.  
So that the direction, the demand of a group is equal to the number of total connected.  
Demand six houses multiply nine, kilowatts per house multiplied amount of factor over the Factor.  
We obtain diversity demand is equal to 6 x 9 x zero point six five over 1.1, which give 31.9 Kenwood's.  
In summary for this video, we have mainly cover the load profile and load characteristic.  
This will form a basis for later, calculation for integrate using renewable generation and low.  
Carbon load, thank you for watching this video.  
I will see you in next video.  

## 1.5	Low Voltage Design and Voltage Regulation
This video will cover some basics for low voltage, Network design and a voltage regulation.  
This will form a basis for designing, a new LV Network or integrating renewable generation and low.  
Carbon load into the existing Network by different voltage, regulation method.  
In this slide we will look into low voltages and procedure in Europe commentary.  
El venado are typically three phase but it is a single phase design in USA.  
In the UK, three phase supply line but single phase to each houses Here, we introduce another concept.  
After diversity, maximum demand called a DMD.  
It is used in the design of electricity distribution Network where demand is aggregate over a large number of customer, a DMD counter for the coins and Peak load a network is likely to experience over its lifetime.  
Such in overall estimation of typical demand.  
The narrower design is traditional determined by using after diversity, maximum demand the method in generally, the following tasks are carried out The design, the urban LV Network result considered protection aspect and the voltage friction.  
Step 1 evaluation of total load to be Supply Step 2.  
Evaluation of the supply capacity of the existing Network step 3, determining of the number of substation require and a practical allocation step with for design overlay, out of LV main Corridor also called distributor, The LV service cable and finally, determine of the cross section area for the main Corridor and a sub sections.  
The distribution Network.  
Operate will adopt different a DMD for each customer according to is typical IE Norm domestic heating? Electricity heating Etc.  
The monster economic cable is then selected for which the voltage drop at the customer connection Point are within the statutory limits.  
Assessment of a DMD for a group customer the maximum period, demand equal to average a DM D kilowatts per customer X number of customer in the group, the map, multiple by load allowance.  
For losses of diversity.  
The table in this slide, show the different a DMD for each customer for a small non lectric non detached house.  
A, the DMD is 1.0 during the day and 0.4 at night.  
For now, electrical detach house, a DMD is 1.4 during the day.  
Hannah 0.6 at night for electric heat.  
Customer a DMD is 3.4 during the day and 2.4 at night.  
The table has also provide a DMD for of peak tariff, for economic 7, with additional afternoon, boost to rate the Tariff and air-conditioned customer.  
Voltage regulation is defined by percentage of voltage job over line with a respected to receive end voltage.  
The voltage drop is the difference between the sending end vs and the receiver end, we are of a lie.  
Normally voltage is the normal value assigned to a line or apparatus or a system of a given voltage class.  
Rated voltage is the voltage at which performs and operation characteristic of apparatus are referred The figure in this slideshow, the meaning of Maximum and a minimum of 24 hours voltage profile for a residential customers, according to British standard e en 50160, the UK 400, KV learning to the line starts.  
Eurasian limit our 10% up limit and -6 % alone limit the red dashed line are the upper limits.  
And the low limits of 6 / for the UK low-voltage.  
400 line is to the line voltage.  
This give 110% at the upper limit and the 934 percent at the low voltage limits.  
This slides illustrate the real voltage measurement curve.  
It is show the five minutes, average, 24 hours voltage profile for 180 residential customer and the measure at the three feeder respectively, it can be seeing that all voltage profile are within the ten percent, and a minus 6% limits as we mentioned before.  
The time period for the the measurement will be determining the accuracy of the data.  
The question is what in fact of a long measurement do reaching such as 1530 minutes in our measurement during the duration? The equipment manufacturer needed to know, the data will voltage variation, in order to design their equipment voltage, operation range, according to UK, saturated instruments, number two, thousand six six, five, the electricity safety, quality, and a community regulation.  
The low-voltage 400 volts Supply limits are 10% up 6 which is low for distribution network of below.  
132 KV the voltage limits are six percent up and -6 % for the transmission Network or 132 KV above the voltage.  
Limit is ten percent up and 10% low.  
We needed to know the above-mentioned UK voltage is saturated statuary voltage, limit for the different network voltage, especially for MV.  
And are we To work.  
Since the sometimes voltage, it may out of statutory limits, British standards.  
50160 for voltage characteristic of electrical supply by public electricity Network, describe how long, the voter violation maybe allow the British standards specify the speed for voltage regulation for any voltage, regulation device, the figure in this size consists of MV, feeder and LV feeder, where the power transformer with tap changer, it is show how power transformer with tap changer, can be used to carry out voltage, regulation control this slideshow and Optimum Voltage job for twenty kilovolts overhead line as a function of the feeder length.  
The plot, a ABC are typical Urban feeder and a mix Urban and low feeder and lure feeders.  
Has it come seeing that the urban feeder is normally has more photo job than the lower area videos due to heavy load.  
From more customer than it, then that in the rural area fetus.  
The voltage drop from mix urban and rural and a feeder is in between urban and rural area.  
Feeders, The online type of change in showing this slice, is the most common voltage regulation device that voltage regulation, really measure, local voltage.  
And also measure the feeder current to exterminate voltage drop at the remote end.  
The really can then calculate the top step to be changing for the online load.  
Tap changer to achieve boost.  
Or reduce the feeder voltage accordingly.  
This slide show that 33 KV do 11 KV power transformer with a line tap changer.  
The left picture show, the Transformer is a fine, Aunty Transformer, the picture at the middle show, the overhead line in feeder into the Transformer, primary the picture are the right show, the secondary terminal feeder into underground cable.  
In this video, we mainly go through the low voltage Network design, procedure, the voltage, regulation, and the UK voltage statuary voltage limits for different Power Network.  
Finally, the basic principle of the line top changing as being described.  
Thank you very much for watching this video.  
I will see you in next video.  
It is the final video in this session 1.  

## 1.6	Voltage Drop Calculation
In this video, we will revise basic voltage job, calculation, equation, and exercise.  
And a simple example.  
The voltage drop is a complex calculation as showing simple, two buses bus 1 and the past two in the figure has one is the sending power into bus 1 and S 2 is the received power at bus to the voltage.  
Drop of Delta V is equal to V.  
1 minus V 2 equal to the line.  
Impedance Z1.  
And X.  
The line.  
Current, I 1 and 2 normally, the typical load at V2 + + V1 and unknown.  
If s 1 and V 1 are known, then it is straightforward.  
We have V1.  
Minus V2, equal to r + JX and multiply s /.  
V 1 conjugate if as to and view 1 are known, then we have a quadratic complex equation.  
V1 and V2 conjugator.  
V 2, a square power equal to r + JX x s 2 conjugate.  
If somehow the line complex losses were known, the process would be S 1 equal to S 2 plus s losses.  
We assume that Rector power can be supplied in the system so that simple voltage drop calculation will only consider real path.  
The automatic difference between the sending and receiving end voltage job.  
V job is given by a real part of our plus JX x s 1 over V 1.  
Conjugate things as 1 conjugate equal to P, 1 minus JQ, 1, the voltage drop is down equal to Your path of Open brackets.  
R.  
+ JX closed.  
Brackets X Open brackets.  
P1 minus JQ.  
1 cross back over V1.  
again, ignore imaginary path, we have a simplified voltage, drop calculation, we drop is equal to Open Bracket r x P1 + + x X q1 a closed back.  
Brackets over V1.  
This is a typical simplified formula.  
However, we still need a power value at the sending end.  
If the network losses are not considered to be significant, then we have the voltage, drop equation related to as to at the receiver end.  
We now have simplified voltage, drop equation.  
We job is equal to Open.  
Brackets are multiplied by P.  
2 plus X.  
Multiply Q to close brackets over V1, depending on given non-power value.  
Ascending end or receive end these two equations, you will be used to calculate voltage job.  
As shown in Figure 1 Hound, your houses load are connected to at end of a low-voltage.  
Feeder at the past three consider each home.  
After diversity, maximum demand is one point killer was and the load.  
Allowance is 8 kilometers to find the answer.  
If the voltage at bus / is / low limits.  
and if discuss, what could it be done, if the voltage at bus 3 is too low, Consider s base is 100 MVA.  
V at the bus for one is equal to 0.4 kilovolts.  
And vbase equal to 4 point.  
Sorry.  
Can I be a repeat again? Yeah.  
So V at the bus bar.  
One is 0.4 kilovolts.  
Navy base is 0.4 kilovolts.  
So that V 1 per unit is equal to per unit.  
A nappy load is equal to 1 Point 5 multiplied, I-55 x 2, + 8, kilo Watts, which you give 173 kilowatts or 0.173 megawatts.  
P load per unit is thus equal to zero point zero.  
Zero one, seven three per unit as reactive power is not given in this Ming, it may be ignored Delta rho G between bus 1 and Abbas by 3 is equal to Open Bracket R1 plus R2.  
Close brackets, x p 3 over V1 equal to open.  
S1.  
18.75.  
Plus, 18.75, close blacks, multiplied by zero point zero, zero one, seven three per unit over 1 per unit which give zero point zero, six four eight billion.  
Voltage a job.  
Hence V 3 is equal to 0.93 five per units.  
The voltage drop limits at 400 KV is minus 6% or the voltage limit is above 0.94% since 0.93, five less than 0.94 has.  
It is out of limits.  
Since the voltage at the bus bar is too low.  
This is outside of Statute limits of voltage, regulation device, and a method will be needed.  
Normally we can consider various voltage regulation device, such as online.  
Tap changer or capacitors or storage or generation or combined.  
Exaggerate this device will be completely covered and discuss in section.  
He later thank you very much for your watching this vinyl video.  
We have complete section one together, the further understanding the contest.  
In Section 1 we have a put a low-voltage Network designed and voltage regulation question.  
See on the Blackboard, I hope you will find the time to complete this crushing sheet.  
If you have any question, please do not hesitate.  
Hesitate to ask.

# 2	Week5
## 2.1	Low Carbon Technologies
Well welcome to section to low-carbon technology in this session, we will cover the main aspect of low-carbon Technologies, including one intermittency issue from renewable generation such as solar photovoltaic or Wing network capacity, issue flung integration of low carbon emission transportation.  
Such as electrical vehicle and Energy Efficiency issue such as electrification of heating, system or heat pumps, smart, Appliance and Etc.  
We will mainly looking each of this low-carbon technology and a study, their impact on network voltage arise job issue as well as the network integration capability for this.  
No, carbon technology.  
In this session, we will cover five topics introduction to low.  
Carbon Technologies, photovoltaic or so-called PV electrical vehicle also called V's energy storage and Energy Efficiency such as heat pump technology.  
First of all, we will look need to understand that low-carbon Technologies are not just limited to Electrical power Network, we will look solar vote.  
I components of great connections.  
We will need to understand the intake.  
Me TC issue for long, study of the PV Generation profile and PV impact on distribution Network, we will also look at the electrical vehicle and a storage technology, the different energy, Charging and discharging method and their impact on the network capacity for the integration of low-carbon Technology.  
Finally, we will looking heat pump technology and understanding how Energy Efficiency may be achieved to help cut CO2 emissions in this slide shows a wide range of low-carbon technology developed in many different industry.  
this technology including low carbon for a renewable Generations, carbon capture and storage Energy, Efficiency, low, CO2 cement Productions, low carbon Transportation fuels, smart agricultural expanding Forest, Produce clean fuels through chemicals Etc as can be seen that low-carbon Technologies are not just limited to the power Network.  
However, in this session, we mainly focus on integration of clean generation renewable generation and a low-carbon loads, including electric vehicle and Energy, Efficiency type of load, Etc.  
The low-carbon Technologies, Empower Network, including clean, fossil fuel oil, gas and Clean Coal through carbon capture technology.  
Nuclear is a clean energy, but how to managing nuclear waste is a very challenging problem, renewable Wing sorrow, way, biomass geothermal, Thermal and hi, Joe Electric.  
Energy storage and transmission storage technology.  
But for the greater wide, smart communication, is a challenge issue.  
energy use and efficiency transport Road electrical vehicle, real shipping and Avid Beijing Industrial Industry efficiency including in building industrial combined heat power domestic Energy Efficiency in home, heat pump and microgeneration.  
In this Slide, the textbook and a reference.  
Are useful information for this session.  
Energy climb, changing committee, published final report name as low-carbon Technologies in a growing economy at the can be found from the website.  
The EV charging methods are obtained from low pay books integration of electrical vehicle in the electrical power system.  
Barbie the book show that aggregate impact of plug-in hybrid electric vehicle on the electrical demand profile.  
Finally, the list to Smart grid book have detailed, the fundamental design analysis, low-carbon Technologies and the challenge Now, we are looking solar photovoltaic technology in our quite detail.  
Finally, we will also study the impact of PV on LV Network and the summary this slideshow, the system components for generation are the PV array made multiple PV module, Framework and structure for module and a Truckers.  
Storage.  
Can be battery.  
Tank flywheel.  
Hi.  
Joe Jing production to resolve.  
The PV inter me TC.  
Electronic power, conditioner, inverter, charger, controller, Rectify, dc-to-dc converter.  
On a generator, diesel gasoline wind turbine to cover.  
PV generation in the night.  
Monitoring system sensor and a data storage device.  
The solar PV system consists of cell modular array.  
Solar cell can contain the active.  
Photovoltaic material.  
PV module can be hold a number of solar cell connected to in series and parallel to build up a peak power already.  
Our PV module Mountain together measure up to several meters.  
And is made of a number of array.  
This slide show the grid connection system as seen in the figure.  
These are our centralized PV Generation, Plant PV at the building rooftop and PV at the house roof top the grid integrate all PV systems PV integration distributed decentralized, microgeneration and Center Just not usual cost effective, without subsidy require a long-term commitments by manufacturer government.  
This is changing as PV become cheaper.  
Justified by image environment benefits and Mark stimulates.  
This light show how great connected PV system works.  
PV system consists of A set of PV array, the generation capability depending on the size of PV array.  
Up of PV array is the DC with a lot of noise so that input filter and dc-dc converter may be used as see.  
A can see that output from the DC and DC converter has become much smoother.  
To changing DC to AC p.  
V inverter is used as can see the output out of inverter is pulse width, modulated waveform, which is changing accordingly to the system frequency 50, hertz in the UK and the Sixers in USA.  
To get AC signal filter is applied to the pwm waveform.  
As you can see that the sinusoidal waveform is obtained after the filters.  
finally, the PV generation with the sinusoidal waveform connected to the grid for low frequency Transformer, this complete, the PV generation 2 grid connections, This slide show how off-grid PV system works.  
Configuration Standalone or hybrid for very remote side, the cost of the grid expansion and upgrade may be too expensive.  
Season load collection is required, but more reliable than grid.  
Often very cost-effective small load best less than tongue, kilowatts lower Capital costs than the grid extension, lower operational, and maintenance costs.  
Then Gene sets and primary batteries.  
This is often can be used to build or for hybrid Village power system, or for remote Cottage or for Telecom or monitoring system in Industrial Systems.  
Thank you for watching this video.  
I will see you next video.  

## 2.2	PV Generation Profiles
In this video we are looking PV Generation profile.  
Firstly, we will exam the PV installed capacity as well as the growth of the PV usage, in the UK, we will then study LV Network and the issue of PV integration into low-voltage Network, Find a way.  
Where is on the PV profile at each house as well as at the network feeders in the UK.  
There is a feed in the Tariff is all called, so-called fitt to incentive.  
The adoption of PV panel, energy production is metered and pay for energy production can be Consumed locally but are not stored energy export to the grid is also emitted and pay for the table show.  
How much PV capacity install and how much generation in each year from 2008 to 2010 16.  
The PV installed capacity in the UK exceed 11.5, gigawatts at end of 2016 with 3.4 percent of total electrical electricity consumption.  
This slideshow, Great Britain PV systems overall capacity has increased from 11 .56.  
Gigawatts in 2016 to twelve point seven four eight Giggles in 2017.  
One of the largest market in Europe, 720,000 plus installation, flung one kilowatt to five megawatts.  
Plus typical domestic installation.  
Is one point five to three point.  
Five, kilowatts per house Energy recommendation G 83 stated 60 amp per Phase 1 phase is three point six eight kilowatts three phases 11.  
.04 kilowatts power factor is 0.95 inductive or capacitive as seen from the figure the domestic PV Is from 0 to 4, kilowatts in store has exceed.  
2.6 gigawatts.  
This slideshow that study was carried out on a typical UK heavy network with 100 households.  
The network consists of a main line AF and three segments line, there are 21 house in the mainline a he 21 houses in the first segment, line e and 34 at a second segment line F and the 24 house in the third, the second one lung have the feeder Transformer rate.  
Is 100 kg vo and the network parameters are 100 household different load Behavior.  
Peak demand of 86.  
Can words household? Use gas for heating? PV panels are 2.5 and 3.5 kilowatts during the summer day in the Middle Island.  
The unbalance the network three phase plus new to analysis was conducted.  
The result of a daily demand from the single house is show in this lies.  
As seen in the figure, the peak electricity use for economic 7 device is on between 1 a.m.  
and 3 a.m.  
the breakfast.  
Activity is between 7 a.m.  
to 9 a.m.  
other on evening activity between 12 p.m.  
to 10 p.m.  
as seen in this figure, the two point five, kilowatts PV panel, generate a power between 5 a.m.  
and 8 a.m.  
adds a PV generation to a single house daily demand.  
In the previous slides, we obtain the daily between demand for long a single house with two point.  
Five kilowatts PV panel as also can be seen from the figure.  
The power become negative in other word that the single house.  
Now, export power, to the feeder, This is good news to this house with PV, as it can get a pay for Generation electricity to the grid.  
If consider all 100 household would like to install PV, would it be possible for this network to allow 100% pvj penetration from 100 house? This slide show? That network capacity is about 45% PV panel charging for 2.5 kilowatt PV panels the network integration, Will be reduced to 32%, PV generation if the PV panel generation from 2.5 kilowatts to 3.5 kilo Watts.  
This slide show the voltage rise at end of the feeder.  
The figure in the left side is 3, phase voltage and the of the feeder The figure in the right side, is the 3 phase voltage at end of feeders, as can be seen that, there is a significant increase in the voltage when consider 30 percent of household having 2.5 kilowatt PV panel installed this.  
Show the voltage statue rate limits is one of the important factor to limit the PV penetration due to the Arise.  
There are also other factors such as accuracy of voltage, measurement, or cable, thermal limits, Etc.  
The slides show, the voltage measurement, being Downton growing stockpot at the greater Manchester.  
Is there three phase power ABC? 30 minutes average, as can be seen the three phase in red blue, yellow, show unbalanced, three phase voltage.  
This slide show the single phase measurement in 30 minutes average with the confidence interval as PV, generation has Inked me TC which is highly dependent on the weather and a random in nature.  
That larger voltage measurement variation and larger measurement confidence interval, which should be also considered being the analysis.  
In summary when consider PV generation penetration internetwork, a number of factors should be considered in the study.  
First of all, due to the voltage rise issue.  
The first is the voltage statue, duration upper limits of 6% for LV Network.  
The second is voltage unbalance in three phase and the third is a voltage measurement accuracy and in the confidence interval, Thank you very much for watching this video.  
I will see you in next video.  

## 2.3	Impact of Small PV Systems
In this video, we are looking impact of a small PV system.  
There are number of issue when Keller out impact analysis of PV.  
LV Transformer are already experienced it, reverse, power flow, Voltage and capacity issue are yet unknown upon complying or false realistic models.  
And sophisticated approaches are required to assess the extended which LV Network can be cope with a higher penetration.  
What is the maximum penetration when do dno need to start worry.  
What is the likelihood of giving penetration to create a problem? This slide to show a typical topology of urban Network in graphic information system.  
It's a color different.  
They to show the different feeders and line.  
As it can be see.  
It is a very complex Network.  
It is very challenged to study the impact of PV penetration on the network.  
In this real-life Network the challenge is you are connectivity.  
Two wrong power flow, study or node in the gis database.  
Should it be connected? This does not necessarily always happen because it's lack of data.  
Conductor information on the ground cable, or overhead.  
A line is sometimes limited or a lawless.  
Type of connections are non.  
No, I the grand Etc face connecting of meter point at the mission number is non know.  
The amount of data is limited to aggregate profile, according to type of customer, Etc.  
This slide show the impact of small-scale PV system, a typical domestic PV system, as a distributed energy resources in the UK.  
Using one minute resolution profile created with models that consider cloud transients and the solar irradiation in the UK.  
as can be seen from the figure that PV profile generated from 2.5 kilowatt PV model under the different Cloud Transitions and a solo he'll radiation conditions, the peak maybe exceed two point five kilowatts at very sunny no, This slide shows the typical load consumption curve with no PV or 50 % PV penetration curve based on the following consideration.  
Generic UK LV feeder with 100 house.  
PV system as distributed energy resources random locate allocated to 50 kilowatts.  
Active powerful at the beginning of the feeder.  
One day.  
The figure in the left show, 0 %, PV and a figure in the right show, the 50 %, PV penetration, the blue curve is D.  
ER and the load is red curve and the total is the black curve.  
Has it got me singing, the feeder has a PV generation export with the peak close to 150 kilowatts.  
This slide shows a typical LV busbar voltage for either zero percent or 50 percent PV panel, tration based on the following consideration.  
Generic you klv feeder with 100 house PV system randomly, allocated voltage LV bus bar with fixed.  
412 volts.  
Line 2 line or two under thirty seven point eight volts, line to ground the figure in the left show, the busbar voltage with 0% PV panel, tracing, as you can see, the voltage is within the two hundred thirty seven point eight volts limits.  
The figure in the right show, the busbar voltage with 50 %, PV penetration as can be seen that busbar voltage has exceeded voltage, limitation of two hundred thirty seven point eight volts in the period of the peak PV generation.  
In other words, the network is not capable to have 50% PV panel tration.  
this slide show a single phase voltage, in a Time series voltage, load and time the figure in the left show, the single phase voltage with load of variation in Time series, 24 hours, No PV generation the figure in the right show, the single phase voltage with load, valuation from 0 to 50 percent.  
In Time series, 24 hours with 50 % PV penetration again, the study showed that impact of PV panels, which is a complex exercise.  
With many variation, which are needed to be considered.  
this slideshow, the study for quantifying the impact of voltage rise on customer in percentage when consider or tongue, random load and a generation simulation for perpetration level, the figure show, 0% the customer, having a voltage problem with 53%, PV panel tration, 10% the customer, having voltage problem, when 92% PV panel tration.  
23% the customer having a voltage problem.  
When 100% PV panel, gyration this slide show the study for quantifying thermal issue over the length of circuit cable overloaded for more than one hour, the figure show zero percent of kilo meter cable with a thermal problem when 50 % D.  
ER, penetration.  
40% of kilometer main feeder cable with thermal problem, when 80% of DVR penetrations, and the less full percent of kilo meter, service of later o cable with the thermal problem when 80% of DVR penetration, this slideshow, the utilization factor in the main feeder when the consideration of maximum power during period of related to normal capacities, The left figure show the utilization Factor at the measurement in one hour.  
The figure in the right, is utilization Factor as the measurement of five minutes? As it can be seen that 80% PV for 100% utilization Factor at the one-armed measure, but only 74% the PV panel creation for 100% you fishing at five minutes measurement, generally, we would use the result for five minutes minutes measurement as it is more accurate accurate and then the result for one hour measurement resolution This show the impact of measurement resolution of PV panel creation is calculation.  
This slides discuss the potential solution to increase PV penetration for LV network, from the dno on load, tap changer or perhaps with a remote measurements.  
the evening line voltage regulator active filter reduce of unbalanced and harmonics, intelligent, disconnector of PV, From the PV system, reactor power, or power factor, 0.95 inductive, the figure, in the left show, the active filter may be installed at the bus bar.  
The figure in the middle show the inline filter or intelligent disconnector of TV.  
Maybe use the figure in the right Show online tap changer all intelligent disconnect of PV may use.  
In summary, the photovoltaic technology play and a significant role in the generation, mixed added, the distribution level, particularly in the country, where it is incentive, or where it is needed to give people access to electricity.  
PV like other renewable generation similar to Wing.  
Inter me TC is one main issue to limit the highwomen.  
Adoption of PV technology.  
However, fit scheme have result in a higher adoption rate of the technology.  
The corresponding impact should be carefully assessed and understood to produce sensible solution.  
Thank you very much for watching this video.  
I will see you in next video.  

EV Specifications and Demand Charging Requirements and Methods
In this video, we are looking electrical vehicle technology specification, the level of demand charging requirement and a method.  
The key issue will be its impact of different charging method for the use of TV on the networker capacity and a water solution to the problem.  
This slide show electricity buzzes the battery pack in the electrical car EV charging.  
Station and EV charging sockets.  
Please note, calendar EV are mainly consider as load by charging energy from the grid.  
However, EV can also be used as a small distributor energy storage by discharging, but a no payment mechanism is in place for Ev use as a small story for the grid.  
At the moment.  
These two slides, slides, three and four show.  
The three popular electric vehicle car found Nissan multi-species and Tesla The electrical car charging station can be seen in Paris London.  
Warsaw in fact, the EV charging station can be seen in most major city.  
Around the world.  
This slideshow, the electric vehicle in the UK electrification of Transport result in less CO2 emission.  
UK registration in 2020 will approximately 2.4 million vehicle 11%.  
Or.  
207 4,000 units.  
Electrical vehicle.  
10% 235 thousand units, hybrid forecast, in cloth of electric vehicle.  
Mainly depend on the cost to the consumers.  
5,000 pounds electrical car grounded skiing launched in 2011, Average age of a car in the UK is 7.1 years.  
Rapidly changing, the number of electric vehicle could take a place.  
This rise is show plug-in vehicle and take forecast, UK, and seeing from the figure from 2015 to 2020.  
The EV growth forecast will be from 5.5 percent to 7.5% in the central cluster visit and about 12% in full range of forecast.  
In fact, the UK government has announced recently that all traditional diesel or petrol car will be stopped to sell in the UK Market by 2040.  
This slideshow, three EV car specification.  
There are Tesla Motor roaster Toyota RAV4 EV, and he drive system.  
Plug it into your top risks and the table show EV range top speed, wait different ranging, from 50 miles to 200 miles, top speed from 34 miles per hour, to 130 miles per hour.  
Wait from 2500 pound to three thousand four hundred eighty pounds, Multiplying 50, kilowatts to 185 kilowatts.  
Battery or Ida nickel metal hydride battery or lithium.  
Charger type, either, 110 volts, or 220 volts with either, 15 hands or 30 amp sockets.  
Battery capacity from nine kilowatts.  
253 kilowatts These slides show the electricity, go vehicle demand energy, use and electrical vehicle Nissan Leaf, 34 kilo, Watts power per 100 miles or 0.21 killer hour per kilometers.  
How far do people drive? Average annual distance is private car drive in the UK is 13,300 old one kilometers.  
What would it be energy required to recharge the car at end of the day, assume 100% charging efficiency.  
This slideshow HV charging requirement.  
There is a number of option for EV charging for are slow to fast charging.  
The first vehicle charging is possible but it comes at a cost of higher, current consumptions.  
Take a car with a 30 kilowatts, Power battery has a example as shown in the table as can sing that through charging rating is 125 kilo.  
VA and a time required from six hour to 30 hours meeting charges from tongue to 25 kilo VA and the time required from one, two, Two point three hours fast charging can be as high as 180 to 400 kilo VA from five minutes to ten minutes.  
So clearly, if one in the motorway faster charging with 5 or 2, 10 minutes is acceptable.  
However, at home due to electricity Supply service cable slow charging with 125kg is more acceptable.  
This slides showed even charging method.  
Then the charging methods are either uncontrolled or controlled in the uncontrolled method, we using them charging or multiple price tariff in the consumers, we may use Smart charging or vehicle to grid method.  
The cost to control method is higher than that, the uncontrolled method.  
However, The impact of different EV charging method on the network capacity.  
Utilization is different.  
The this slide show, the impact of different EV charging method on a typical Portuguese, MV network with 30%.  
It PV panel tration, as can be seen from the left top figure though overload, in the network with low, EV the top right figure show the overload in the number of lying when using Dom charge method, similar to the bottom left figure, show the overload in a number of line, using Doterra for policy, finally, the bottom right figure show that the no overload in the network.  
Clearly, the different charging method do have the impact of the network loading capability by considering the network loading variation the load.  
Estimation uncertainty and a measurement in yellow.  
The study impact of EV integration is not a trivial task, which will be.  
Look at the next video.  
Thank you very much for watching this video.  
I will see you in next video.  

## 2.4	Impact of EVs on LV networks
In this video we are looking the impact of EV en el v Network.  
Firstly, we will examine how people to charge v's and I will then carry out impact analysis on a typical distribution LV network with deterministic and up probabilistic method.  
The analysis will allow us to understand what the parameters will need to.  
Consider when study EV penetration level for a given Network to Graphics in this slide show how people to charge and a using EV the first graph is, the probability distribution of EV connection time.  
And the second graph is the probability distribution function for the daily.  
Ed energy, requirement, the study was down as one of our Irish demonstration initiative project publish in thyroid conference 2013, as can be seen from the first graph, the EVP take charge in the evening around 9 p.m.  
to 11 p.m.  
and a floor on the second graph.  
The peak usage of EV for travel between 8 a.m.  
and 10 a.m.  
This slideshow to graph the probability of charge EV during weekday and weekend.  
Buy stocks power thousand Electric City, Innovation Squad, my electricity.  
And when you project, the project investigate, the use of domestic smart socket to managing Network constraint caused by the electrical vehicle, And a novel commercial arrangement.  
The weekday graph show to Peak charge every time in the early morning and in the evening while the week and graphs show the EV charge activity from morning to evening.  
this slide show the impact analysis on a typical LV network using open DSS based the simulation analysis, the table listing the line parameter, and iterating, the figure show, how 100 customers are connected to network and the The network of peak demand is 200, 75 kilowatts, the other consideration including driving pattern, different type of, EV penetration level charges start time, and a battery status are determined to Mystic Manor.  
This slide show, the impact analysis, for slow, and a fast charge EV for the network, Transformer rating at 400 kilo.  
VA the left figure show the networker demand against the EV penetration in percentage, it can see that for slow charge EV the penetration level can reach to 65%, but the fast charging EV can only Allow about 35% the right figure.  
Show the voltage, drop for the fast charge EV analysis when no Evie penetration or voltage job.  
Variation are within six percent.  
However, when consider 50% EV penetration significant period of voltage, drop our exceed six percent, This slide show the impact analysis for the Transformer losses of life, being percentage per year and energy loss.  
For one week, can be seen from left to figure for 10% TV.  
Penetration.  
The Transformer loss of life is 0.01 percent.  
However, for 90% EV penetration the Transformer loss of life increase to 0.1, Percent for slow charge and about 0.8 percent for fast.  
Charging in the right side.  
Figure if consider $0.65 EV penetration at the Cami.  
See that the energy loss is about three point two percent for slow charging, and it is about 3.5 percent for fast charging.  
This slide shows the probability impact, analysis, Arnold Rio residential LV Network, 5 feeder, 326 customers.  
As showing the figure using Monte Carlo by consider the following load for long Crest model and the UK office for National statistics date slow, charging model, Nissan Leaf battery.  
24 kilowatt hour for eight hours one week days and one weekend per month.  
Open this the based analysis for three phase plus neutral.  
The table shows the random select household size, from one person to four or more persons with total mm load profiles.  
This slide shows the further consideration for the probability impact analysis, on a real residential LV Network, the table.  
Show the probability distribution in percentage and the number of profile for the travel and time from 1 p.m.  
in the afternoon to 11 p.m.  
The further consideration in this slice listed at the UK National survey which you can be translating to average daily, my knowledge, the figure show the four-wheeled EV cars in percentage against annual managers.  
For example, the largest 21 % EV car travel and Yuri managed from 5S.  
Wasn't two six, nine nine nine miles small percentage EV car are either iron under 500 miles or over 30,000 miles.  
This slide shows the voltage job for all five, feeder from 1 to 5, as can see that feeder to voltage open, just exceed six percent at 30%, EV penetration, while the voltage job, in all other for feeder are within 2%.  
Even at 50% EV penetration, the results show the EV penetration level four different feeder, Varies.  
this light show the peak demand for all five feeder, as you can see again that Deepika demand increase while higher penetration Feeder to has the highest peak demand.  
While the feeder firing has the lowest the total Peak demand from the sum of the five.  
Feeders is limited in the substation.  
Transformer hands, what a level of EV penetration is limited by substation Transformer rating.  
This slide show the usage as assets as can see.  
That one feeder, feeder to is approach its limit.  
When 50% of EV penetration, This rise to show that coins and in fact for Ev penetration, as can be seen from the figure for know, EV the coins in the factor is 0 and for 10% EV penetration.  
The coins in the fact is 0.6, it is also interesting to see that coins and fact, is increased as a EV penetration increase, as we know that coins, the fact is Ratio of the maximum demand of the group, I EV over the sum of their individual maximum.  
Demand has this can be explained that the probability for a small set of group to reach their individual p.  
A coins in the lake is greater than the probability.  
For more widespread large set of the group to reach their individual Peak demand constantly This slide show the impact assessment for the low-carbon technology on Great Britain, power distribution Network for Ev slow and fast charging for home.  
And work respectively, the four plots show how diversify for the changing profile of EV can be for the distribution utility the aggregate charge profile of all Come along all feeder would be used for the impact analysis of EV, penetration thank you very much for watching this video.  
I will see you in next video.  

## 2.5	Examples of Impact of EV use
In this video, we are looking example for the impact of EV en el v Network example 1, we looking in packed electric vehicle usage.  
The question is one-third of 150 house.  
In an LV feeder High purchase, an electrical vehicle assume average Diversified maximum demand.  
Or also called a DMD of each house is 1.5 kilo Watts all will use a low charging regime, five hours from empty.  
The average distance travel from one person in a day is about 20 miles and in distribution.  
Transformer has a capacity of 400 KV a determining one.  
What is the treatment energy requirement to can the network deliver this extra energy 3 how the network accommodate this? The answer is for 1, each house a DMD is 1.5 K towards the total LV.  
Feeder P load is equal to 1.5 x 150 equal to 225 kilowatts.  
Since one third house of 150 have abs assume 18, kilowatts Our will be used on the twenty miles.  
Hence extra 900 kilowatt hour energy will be needed using five.  
Our charging has 18 kilowatt hour over five hours is equal to 3 point 6 kilowatt hour per hour will be needed at the worst case scenario.  
50 house, multiply 3.6 kilowatts is equal to 180.  
Kilowatts will be needed.  
The total capacity is p load plus 180 kilowatts equal to 400 oh five kilowatts Answer or two as the substation, Transformer rating is 400.  
KV a The worst case, the total capacity require is 400 o5k watts, which is exceed the Transformer capacity, answer for three.  
We can use even slower, charger, or using smart charger to avoid the EV charging at the same time or are the possible solution, which you can be found from literature reading.  
Example, 2 University multiple storage a car park, has 200 car, park space, having trouble, and average about 10 miles, the staff Park in the car park.  
And the wish to charge the electrical vehicle inside assume 18, kilowatt-hour battery.  
Can be used for driving for 60 miles from Full to empty.  
Determine the following one.  
What is the total energy requirement to water is the peak power requirement.  
3, how would the peak load manager? Answer for one since the battery being consumed for Thomas its energy has been discharged 1 over 6 or 3 kilowatt hour.  
The total energy of 200.  
EV x 3 kilowatt hour, equal to 600 kilo per hour.  
The answer for to the peak power Demand on the charging time.  
5 hours slow charger will require 120 kilowatt hour.  
One hour meeting charge will require six hundred kilowatt hour.  
Tell me in is a fast-charging.  
Time will require three point.  
Six.  
Megawatts, our, the Unser three to manage it.  
The peak load consider slow, or smart charge method, or consider to install a large distribution substation, or reading Fortune Network to supply.  
The Pika power.  
If the fast charge must be used Such as at a Motorway service station.  
Example 3, the study the network and is parameters are showing the figure each house has a DMD of one point five kilowatts the network load.  
Allowance is a kilowatts assume EV install 24 kilowatt hour battery data can be fully charged in eight hours.  
The Transformer capacity.  
Is 500 KVA.  
Answer is given in this slide sings.  
A the MD / house is 1.5 kilos for 100 house.  
In a worst-case scenario power.  
A DMD equal to 1 Point 5, multiplied by 100 plus 8 equal to 158 km/h.  
Or 0.15 megawatts for 24, kilowatt hour battery in need charging time.  
Eight hours each hour charging will require 3 kilowatts or 0.003 megawatts.  
Since the line R1 is equal to eighteen point seven five per unit and are equal to R1 plus R2.  
To equal to 37 point 5 per unit at the base.  
100 MVA converter p a DMD in per unit, we have P 80 mg per unit equal to 0.15 8 megawatts over 100 MVA equal to zero point zero zero one five eight per unit we also have p EV per unit equal to 0.03 over 100 multiplied by n equal to 0 point 0, 0, 0, 0 3, multiply n, using the simple voltage.  
Drop equation.  
We have Delta V equal to V 1.  
Minus V 2 equal to R.  
Multiply p over V1 assume V 1 equal to 1.0 for per unit.  
Need to be given for a maximum number of EV penetration.  
In the network.  
The voltages job at these three should not below.  
0.94% IE 6 % this give the Up of 0.1 per unit has Delta V is equal to V.  
1, minus V 2 equal to 0.1.  
Also equal to R multiply p over V1 or 1.04 per unit.  
We have our x p a DMD, + P.  
EV we equal to 0.375 multiply closed, brackets 0.0015, 8, per unit, plus zero point zero, zero, zero, zero three, multiply n, The brackets equal to 0.1 o4, we obtained and equal to 3 in 9.7 percent or 40 percent.  
Thank you very much for watching this video video.  
I'll see you in next video.  

## 2.6	Storage and Other Technologies
Found this video, we have star to look at the storage and other technology.  
We mainly study the storage specification and understanding various storage tech knowledge.  
We will also investigate how storage can be used for active power management.  
Finally, we will look the heat pump technology, which you can be categorizing to load efficiency.  
The storage.  
We're changing everything for power system, it is a holy grail of the power system.  
Consider the tech acknowledge battery for I will compress air Etc, the consider application frequency, control Peak shaving, constraint management, Voltage thermal active and reactive support intentionally islanding and other as an array accelerate service.  
This scishow 5 will acknowledge as a storage, the Syrian attack spring at very high speed.  
By a motor, to store kinetic energy and it will release energy as a generator.  
For a short period of time to support the power to the system.  
The pros, the fast, charge and discharge compact.  
Long life.  
The khans.  
The power loss is fast than battery only came Supply power for a short period of time.  
This slide show the pump Hydro technology as a storage, the process of water being pumped from the lower Reservoir uphill.  
Then allow it to flow.  
Downhill through turbine to produce electricity during a peak.  
The plow, the readily available and widely used in high power application.  
Low cost of power can be using for frequency to regulation and reserved, The calm.  
Planning due to environment aspect can only be increment in the area with heels.  
This slideshow? The Compressed Air Technology as storage.  
The process of are being compressed and stored in airtight underground cave, ins during off-peak, then allow it to expand through the combustion, engine engine to produce electricity during Peak.  
The pros is Kong's serves natural gas by using low-cost heated compressed.  
Air to the Our turbine, the calm low efficiency, due to extra reheating to turn on the turbine.  
I for every one, kilowatt-hour, only 0.5 kg our out, Area with suitable underground Caverns is needed.  
Use Battery Technology as storage, the other one, teacher Battery Technology, including lithium iron problem, Mario and nickel metal hydride.  
So then so far, The pro less space then lead acid battery.  
The Combs is too expensive for large-scale application battery.  
As a storage are very expensive.  
This slideshow, we met using EV as a storage.  
The imagine.  
If UK would adopt all EV cars policy, the total along the 24 million car on UK load average, battery capacity of 30 kilowatt hour of electricity, the total energy stored would be 720 gigawatts, the Energy consumption in a single day is 1000 whole 37, gigawatts of power.  
Clearly, electricity vehicle could play and a significant role as energy sources should a power outage occur.  
And elect Evie could a play.  
Low ink keep Supply is on currently, many research to promote vehicle to grid.  
Tech knowledge.  
The question is how feasible it might be.  
The table in this size, show the comparison of some technical properties for some storage technology.  
Clearly, Battery Technology has a short life cycle than the traditional storage technology, including flywheel, compressed air, and pumped, Hydro other technology property, including the storage efficiency and Battery density and a rating.  
The table show, the comparison of the capital cost for some tech knowledge as can see that Leah room battery and the Fly will appear.  
The most expensive energy storage technology for a kilowatt hour while the compressed air or pumper Hydro are the least expensive.  
This slideshow the regulation expect for the storage for vertical integrate Market.  
The multiple potential benefits for Soldier can be added up.  
Can we use for the network active power management and that will reduce the cost of electricity etc for competitive market? The crashing, is that.  
Our transmission or distribution Network operators allow to own or operate a storage installed.  
Colin today, T and O and D NOS are not allowed to own production units, but the storage are considered as a production unit, which are not allow for tea and no and dno Overall Network fishing the maybe the best justification for using storage.  
The question is how to dealing with energy production in summary this video briefly looking a various storage technology.  
Technical characteristic, the cost the regulatory aspect.  
Thank you very much for watching this video.  
I will see you in next video.  

## 2.7	Examples of Storage Application
In this video, we are looking the example of storage application.  
The soldier can be used for active power management, sings variation in power flow through a substation with the G.  
The storage facility is used down string of the substation.  
In the figure 2 dashed line, represent the generation at a peak production and a low production, the curve is the load curve.  
As is can see that.  
Monica of has to peek over DG production which will need the storage to supply the power.  
And the load curve has one very below the DG low production, which you can be used to charge the storage.  
this slide shows some important parameter for Dimension and a schedule scheduling storage, including one amount of useful energy, that can be stored in kilowatt hour is maximum energy, level minimal, To maximum charge rating kilowatts, the three maximum discharge rating in kilowatts.  
For we also consider efficiency in percentage which is the ratio of energy output to the energy input.  
This slide show that storage can be used to increase EV connection.  
Consider 3 1 phase, 25 kilowatt VA.  
Over three hours storage.  
In the network described in early video, assumed charge a between 1 a.m.  
to 5 a.m.  
and a discharge between 7 p.m.  
and 9 p.m.  
the figure in the right show that the green curve for 70%.  
EV penetration without study exceed the substation transform rating of 400.  
KV a But the blue curve for 70% TV, penetration.  
With three phase storage.  
25 kilowatts and a 75 Keller were our is okay, the results show that storage can help increase the connection of EV from 65% to 70%.  
Exercise 1, the value in the load profile show the maximum power exceed.  
The nominal capacity 1.2 Mac OS of the substation.  
The length of the corresponding critical period.  
Determine one maximum cost of sodium sulfide, battery installed on string.  
That's the substation for Peak shaving.  
With a round trip, efficiency of 85 percent.  
When or would it be more suitable for charge the battery from figure? We can get the following.  
The storage discharge for 150 kilowatts for 1 hour.  
And the 300 kilowatts for 3-hour the story charge, 300 Carol was at the minimum load for three hour.  
Answer, as can be seen from the figure, the peak demand that exceed generation, red dash line is 150.  
Killer what during one hour? Or energy 150 kilowatt hour, plus 300 kilowatts during three-hour.  
IE 100 kilo watts per hour.  
Peak demand exceed, the generation for three hour long trip, efficiency of 85% equal to energy charged 100% and a discharge 80% 85%.  
Storage discharged total energy at a peak 150, Colonel Watts? multiply 1 hour, plus 100 kilowatts x 3 hour which is equal to 150 killer was our plus 300 kilowatt hour, equal to 450 kilowatt hour to discharge storage, need to be charging 450 killer or our / 85%, efficiency equal to 529 kilowatt hour.  
Hence, the battery capacity is either 539 km per hour or 353.  
Keller was plot, a X 1.5 hour or one, seven seven kilowatts, multiply three hour.  
For the peak shaving needs.  
Nice battery require 529 kilowatts capacity.  
If the cost is $2,000.  
See the table in the previous video.  
Hence, the cost equal to 5 over a hundred.  
Twenty-nine can words, multiply 2000 US dollar equal to 1 million.  
And the 58,000 US dollar.  
Sings the EV charge and the discharge a profile among consumer, very significantly.  
We normally consider aggregation for EV charging and discharging.  
Why what are aggregator? The third party company that aggregate the have available storage charge discharge etc, for a hundreds to me.  
Is of customer such as eBay.  
The aggregate resources can then be provide as a service to dno all the system operator.  
The pros the customer make the most of their storage more options and flexibility for the system and network operate.  
And it can it can help the differ of investment and aggregate banners from diversity.  
The Combs is dispersed of resources.  
Might not be good for local service.  
Concentration of the resources might look why coordination with dno.  
Neither market and a tariff structure, and ICT become a very challenge.  
The final remark for the storage application are the storage offer many potential benefits but they depend on the corresponding regulatory framework solution depending on who own and operate storage dno Peak shaving congestion management investment deferral.  
Integrate of Renewables and anxiety reservist.  
4dg, owner-operator integrate of renewable, increase dispatch ability for third party.  
IED, aggregator, the peak shaving congestion management exhilaration service will reduce the cost of electricity during the peak in summary.  
In this video, we have look some storage application.  
We use an example to calculate the storage size for active power management, which can help increase EV penetration into Network.  
Thank you very much for watching this video.  
I will see you in next video.  

## 2.8	Heat Pump Technologies
In this session, we are looking heat pump a technology, including operation principle heat pump characteristic type of heat pump load profile of heat pump and hit pound growth by country by 2020.  
The reference used in this video are listed in the following modeling heat pump has a combined heat and power plant in energy generation planning, IEEE energy, tag published May 2012.  
The facts inference.  
You the uptake of the heat pump technology by UK.  
Domestic sector.  
Renewable energy value.  
35 published 2010.  
Managing the future network impact.  
Electrification overheat.  
Pop's is Delta energy, environment June 2016.  
Probability assessment of heat, pump usage, and their impact on Distribution Systems.  
2016, MSE dissertation at the University of Manchester These slides to show operation of a heat pump as camping sing that heat pump consists of four, main parts compressor condenser photo, vow and evaporator.  
The compressor is drive by a motor which consume electricity the heat from the lower temperature source, which can be are ground.  
River or lake water.  
The condenser produce a useful heat to indoor space or hot water.  
The characteristics of the heat pump are electric heat pumps.  
One of the efficiency device capable of transferring thermal energy from a place with lower temperature level to a place with a higher temperature level.  
Fourth domestic heating the place with lower temperature level is heat source for our electricity heat pump extractor heat energy for can ambient air, ground, the soil or water.  
The heat sink is the place where the higher temperature level such as space heating or domestic hot water.  
Performance over heat.  
Pump is usually described in terms of efficiency of a performance Co p.  
0 P equal to Q over W.  
Where Q is useful heat output of heat pump W is the compressor fan or power consumed.  
If the court efficiency performance cop of heat pump is usually in the range of three to five.  
The relation between COPD of the heat pump and the outdoor temperature is shown in this figure as can be seen.  
The COPD is higher for temperature output at 35 degrees Celsius.  
Then that for the temperature output at 45 degrees Celsius for outdoor temperature, of minus 5, degree Celsius to heat, hot water too.  
55 degree celsius, cop can still be to this mean that one can reduce the electricity for heat 4 and 1/2 as a CEO p is equal to 2.  
The type of a heat pump including air source heat pump ashp would Source heat pump WS HP and ground Source heat pump GS HP.  
The figure show how different heat pump technology to use external heat source For the air source, cop of any typical heat pump is between 3 to 3.5.  
I output of three point five kilowatts equal to two point five kilowatts are Source plus 1 K roads electricity for any air source, figure show what heat pump air source look like for Guang sauce.  
Cop of a typical heat pump for ground source is equal to 425 I eat the output of 4.  
Kilowatts equal to 3 kilowatts grants Source plus 1, kilowatt of electricity the figures Show, how he pumpkin sauce look like The heat pump can be model on the different Home Building.  
Occupants assumption for Arc.  
Occupancy type are given in these slides occupants type one.  
At least one of the occupant in this type of family.  
Have a part-time job in the morning, I session.  
the occupant time is from 9, a.m.  
to 1 p.m.  
Occupants of type to the occupants in.  
This type family has a full-time job.  
The unoccupied time is from 9 a.m.  
to 6 p.m.  
occupancy type 3, the occupants being.  
This type family may have one or more pensioner.  
All this able person.  
And all unemployed.  
Hence the the well he's occupied through the day.  
This slideshow three typical heat pump load profile.  
For type 1 2 and 3 respectively.  
Plot for type of Ensure the most electricity consumption for the people who doing the part-time job, the plot type to show the electricity use for heat pump home in the morning.  
And in the evening, the left figure shows the typical heat pump load profile for type 1 type 2 and 3 based on the basic insulated the wells.  
Right side show.  
The load of profile based on well-insulated their wealth by compiling.  
The plot into figures the electricity in put the for well insulated wall is less than that.  
The basic insulate their wealth.  
This slideshow daily load profile for and a household in March June and September, December respectively.  
Here show the heat, pump a load profile from four different UK project the load of curve.  
In the figure, our aggregate solution for the network heat pump of modeling.  
This slideshow, the UK heat pump Grove from 2005 to 2013.  
This slideshow heat pump growth by country by 2020.  
As can be seen that you can either 27% to meet 2020 heat, pump growth commitment.  
Why? Japan currently is already installed, large number of heat pump units.  
Now, thank you very much for watching this video.  
We are now completely section 2.  
I will see you in Section 3.

# 3	Week6
## 3.1	Active Network Management Applications in Real Time
In this video, we will look at a number of innovation project and to understand how active Network management maybe Implement in practice.  
So far we have look, what is a and m and how I am can be used to maximize the G integration.  
The next big question are how we moving forward, who will do more research and development and implementation and who is going to invest in this type of solution, Luckily UK government to provide incentive to facilitate EDG connection and a network Innovation.  
The founding including the following distribution price control review 5 from 2010 to 2015, with Rio means Revenue equal to incentive plus Innovation and a plus output model.  
Innovation founding incentive for IFI before.  
2013.  
Now is Network Innovation, allowance called and I a Allowed to invest R&D with zero, five percent of DL, no invoice Revenue.  
Dno incentive with.  
Two pound 50, kilowatts per year for 15 years and the arrow have two more, a pro active approach.  
Register power zone, go rpz is plus 2 pound kilowatts per year for the first five years.  
The Limited of 0.5 million pounds for dno per year.  
The aim is to develop a more cost-effective way to connecting the G.  
For example, register power Zone project by Iran social network.  
The project is about thermal constraints or line rating.  
It is provide a dynamic monitoring of line capacity at 132 KV to increase the connection capacity of DG.  
It helped transport energy from offshore wind farm.  
The overhead line capacity is calculated by using ambient temperature and wind speed.  
It is use powdered Donuts to do current and temperature measurements, the measurements of data are collected in real time.  
This rice is show rpz project by E DF energy.  
The project is the voltage, constraint it deploy, the coordination control of online, type of changing technique.  
It is using measurement system.  
Aging generation and demand data in real-time at the claim being able to increase significantly the connection of capacity of DG might double it.  
This slideshow rpz project by Scottish and sudden energy SSE, the project is thermal constraints, since the orkney islands, have the great winged resources, but are connected to the mainland by sub seen cable the system, use shook it.  
Availability.  
Ring Power available availability and demand availability to increase significantly.  
The export capacity.  
SSE, rpz project, the some constraint has the following parameters.  
A megawatts minimum demand in summer.  
31 megawatts, maximum demand in the winter.  
To 33 KV substitute cable.  
Existing generation, including Wing wave and gas existing.  
Generally have a using most of available capacity of the local network.  
The founding are, there is a lot of interesting in connecting more DG but a conventional solution or too expensive.  
30, meaning palms for distribution, and the 100 million pound for transmission.  
I pz was registered in 2005, pilot project successful wrong in 2006 currently easy fully implemented.  
This slide show.  
How does SS R pz thermal constrained Project work? It is real-time control of wing and a wave power.  
Each is own, has a thermal limits according to generation, level new generating capacity varies with the level of demand and existing generation.  
The orkney system has a limited protected.  
See C cable wrapped compensation exist in the area.  
RP Z SS e thermal constrained project, demonstrated ability of Active network menu system to dispatch the real-time.  
The power output of winged form it is using proven communication system and a logic, the figure show how this step point to control Wing Farm being issue in real time.  
IP Z SS e, thermal constrained project is the first Active network menu.  
System in the UK with multiple generation development and implementation of A and M is not trivial.  
This is new and different from the fit and forget generation has to be dispatchable.  
Additional costs due to control and communication system, batteries are Financial.  
Not a technical RP Z SS e thermal constrained project provide a commercial presence, although the off Jane incentive do enough Innovation but incentive are not enough dialogue with generator, owner, operator is very important.  
It is crucial to have a partnership between industry and University, the better understanding of participation reliability, and a better understanding of risk and gain new commercial model needed to be develop new methodology for using the system charge are required.  
This slide lists.  
The some practical conclusion about A and M.  
The third theory is being translated into implementation.  
Do you know our become more confident about new technology.  
So strong incentive from regulator are very important.  
Idea, are relatively easy but implementation and Commercial application are a great sister challenge due to the real-time measurements expensive.  
the UK of June also provide the low-carbon network fund, it's tier 2 project, there are in 2010, custom leaded Network, Revolution by Central Cee electrical UK the low-carbon, London low-carbon, hop LV Network template for allow low carbon future in 2011, The project including flexible, plug-and-play, Bristol X Valley Vision, to capacity, to customers, flexible network of for low carbon future and a firearm.  
In 2012.  
The acceleration renewable connection and a customer loaded active system.  
Service flexing net Advanced fault level management in Birmingham Innovation Squad and a smart network storage in 2013, the ETA the quality efficiency distribution Network, flexible Urban Network, Voltage.  
And a solvent, our cave value from the efficiency.  
Where you customer and Energy Efficiency in 2014 Network equal re period.  
The fault.  
Level active response.  
The can't active system management and a low-energy automated Network.  
The class of customer loaded active system.  
It is electrical Network, Northwest limit, the low-carbon, net, will Farm From 2012 with tier one to project.  
Total award is 7.2 million pounds.  
The scope his invest how reduce and increase voltage under distribution Network can reduce Peak demand or increase demand of the when the needed service to National Grid.  
The second is tablet staggering using the reactive power capacity through the using of circulating current and a service to the National Grid and a thirdly is try to consider only primary substation 33.  
KV 2 11 KV or 6.6 KV.  
One of the most Innovative teaching idea is vast support to transmission Network by means of distribution Network.  
It apply the type of staggered operation to primary substation.  
Pedal Transformer being distributed work to absorb the reactive power during the transmission voltage voltage rise.  
The idea in IEEE, transaction paper one, the IEEE PES price paper in 2017 Business to show how establish provision of DSO resources, availability to the TSO, via the dashboard, the method, including aggregate, or / primary deterministic, or probability, and real-time forecasting of demand macros.  
And the make vows This slide show The Innovation Squad, management unconstraint EV connection, EA, technology, and Scottish, and Southern La energy.  
The low-carbon network found.  
2012 K-12 project with the total award 4.2 million pounds.  
The scope of the project are access the technique and economic impact on computer EV + E Electrical heat pump on the real l v Network.  
Estimated that economic benefits, the investor deferral of Odin's you likely effect on EV en e.  
HP up taken And a carbon saving front adopt a control scheme to manage your EV and e, h GP.  
And finally, at the improve the Express.  
Technology is a patterned by EA technology.  
Consider model predictive control copy MC.  
this slide shows the how flexible control, The secondary substation, power transformer.  
Tap changer to maximize the integration of EV for both charging and discharging.  
The challenge are twofold charging behavior of EV and modeling of customers.  
These slides to show the mean, mini stochastic analysis, for a real UK, every Network Plus, in the figure show 100, EV penetration with no control will exceed.  
Primary substation.  
Transformer, Caper capacity with the control EV charging time.  
Will shift it to ensure that no EV charging period will exceed Transformer capacities.  
This slides show the ETA or smart strip project.  
ETA is a for from Beijing Greek.  
Meaning the estimated time of arrival, this is electricity, Northwest, limited.  
Low-carbon network found project started.  
2013.  
Tier 2.  
The total award is a point for Milling.  
The scope is using Innovative technology to manage your voltage on low.  
Voltage networks, with aim to create capacity for low-carbon technology, Dynamic reconfiguration of LV + HV Network and conservation voltage reduction by coordinate online, type of changing and capacity Bank.  
To achieve a better Network efficiency.  
In conclusion, there are potential, large benefits of implementing Active network management of distribution Network.  
Increased capacity of dg2 B connector to the existing Network.  
Active management of distribution network is likely to be particularly beneficial for week and we loo area network needed to demonstrate the feasibility of active distribution Network management required quantification of cost of the active distribution.  
And a require control system to be designed few the test to be carried out and development of commercial Arrangement.  
Finally, it is should be mentioned that Active network meant? It is the building block for the smart distribution Network.  
Thank you for watching this video.  
We now complete this Section 3 for the second part of this new.  
As always, if you if you have any question, please do not hesitate to contact your tutor and course at the visor, good luck in your revision.  

## 3.2	Active Network Management Modelling and Case Studies
In this video, we will look how active Network management is used to maximize the high renewable DG and LCT penetration first.  
We will look at the challenge of DG planning operation monitoring and control considered EG planning operation to what extent can Innovative scheme or more intelligent Network, increase the penetration of renewable DT.  
Kandg being used to provide the support to the system to what extend rule base control will handling evolve in complex systems.  
Consider a control of network device participation.  
Do we use the centralized or decentralized or distributed control method? Consider the monitoring, how to manage larger volume of data or Data to, in order to provide a meaningful result.  
This slide show how to consider AC optimal power flow.  
It a formulates, a maximum, or minimum objective function with the constraint real and reactive.  
No Power Balance voltage level construing voltage, angle set to the zero for the reference bus, says thermal Limits line and Transformer.  
And constant power factor operation of D G Unit.  
This is a snapshot approach and does not catering the variability of demand and the renewable operation.  
It is no smart grid, it does not evaluate envisage the benefits.  
This slide show the optimization for consider smart grid control, schemes new constraint and a new control scheme will be needed.  
The new constraint, our voltage step changing and own security construing.  
Reverse power flow, constraint for label, constraint Etc.  
For new control scheme, our coordinate voltage control adapter, power factor, control, generation, containment, Dynamic, rating, etc, etc.  
This slide show how to handling the variability of demand and a generation with multiple periods.  
The plot in the top figure are the analog of form of demand rather color curve.  
And the wind generation blue color code.  
The plot in the bottom, figure are the measure mandate obtained with the consideration of multiple period, as cans.  
Being seen from the figure, the demand of vary from 50% to 70% to 90% however Wing generation can be vary from no generation of 0% to 100% however Wing generation can be vary from no generation of 0% to 100% based on the demand and the duration curve, the percentage of peak demand and a percentage generation over hourly time can be calculated for example, the time, duration for the scenario with 100% Peak demand, No exist.  
And a zero percent of generation capacity is zero hour.  
However, the time duration for the scenario, 70% Peak demand and a 90% of generation capacity can be calculated about 956 hours in this slide show the percentage Peak demand and a percentage generation over an hour in 3 dimension.  
The demand are only at 50% 70% and 90% in corresponding to the wind generation valuation, as being as can be calculated that scenario with seventy percent of peak demand.  
And a 90% of generation capacity is 956 hour and a scenario with 100%.  
The peak demand and 0% of generation capacity is zero hour.  
The three dimension Plot show that the relation between percentage of peak demand, and the percent of generation capacity over our or yearly this, give a full picture of how to handle variability of demand and generation.  
We now have a look at the case study on a UK.  
Generic distribution Network.  
Go.  
City at the S simplify ehv Network.  
It is 30 3 / 11 KV with 16 passes.  
A parallel Transformer with online type of changer.  
A voltage, regulator 1 DG with a peak demand, 38.2 megawatts, and the energy losses is 3.6%, this coordinator voltage control CBC and a parallel Transformers.  
The voltage regulator, the d g with a power containment and a power factor control.  
This slide show that comparison result for connectable DG between power factor control, and a coordinated voltage control, IE CVC with or without power containment control, the power factor control, including adaptive, power factor control, IE a PF, inductive power factor of 0.98, you know.  
Factor to capacity, power factor of 0.98, CVC containment and control, including CVC no containment or with two percent containment, or five percent containment or ten percent containment at the can be seen that maximum.  
DG capacity is 17.4 mackworth.  
When using adaptive power factor Ctrl + C VC with 10 percent.  
Containment the smallest DG capacity is 3.1 megawatts, with capacity, power factor of 0.98 and a no CBC with no containment.  
We now have a look at the case study on UK.  
Generic Distribution Center work full year to be one network.  
It is 33 KV over 11, KV with 621 buses and 6dg sides, the peak demand is 38.2, megawatts and energy losses is 4.7% The coordinator can voltage control system controlled apparel Transformer and a voltage, regulator 1 DG with power containment and another ddg with adaptive power factor control.  
This slide show, the comparison result for connectable DG between power factor.  
Ctrl, + C VC with without power containment control as can be seen that maximum.  
DG capacity, now has 56.8 megawatts, when using adaptive power factor Ctrl + C VC with 10 percent containment if use CV, C, plus Active power factor control, + 2 percent containment.  
The conchos skin can be provide 47.7 micro SD G penetration which is 124 percent relative to Peak demand of 38.2 megawatts.  
This slide shows the energy required from the transmission bulk supply in percentage and a unit loss in percentage, it is show the energy input from the transmission box.  
Apply reduce when apply the containment and increase percentage CBC but a unit loss increase.  
For example, consider CVT with adaptive power factor Ctrl + 2, Entertainment, we have nine point seven percent losses, and only 22 percent dependencies.  
This slide show the case study for considering line Dynamic rating.  
It is a simple network with a five kilometer long.  
Feeder, the peak demand is fi Mac towards the line.  
Dynamic rating is fifteen point.  
Five megawatts in the winter 14.7 Mac bar in the spring and Autumn And a 13 Point, 5 Mega Mall in summer, the 3D figure, the bottom of the percentage demand and a percentage generation over our time.  
For the winter should bring or Autumn and summer respectively.  
As can be seeing that the variability between the demand and the generation.  
In Spring appear, more secretive African than that in the winter and the summer.  
This slide show the connectable DG capacity for the network waiting line rating.  
As you can see that Dynamic rating plus C VC.  
Plus the unit power factor can double d g.  
Penetration to thirty seven point one megawatts that result Active network management.  
This slide show how connect a modiji in HV & Eatery network.  
Is it possible to connect a mortgage at 33 KV, or 132 KV assume Wing Farm? Be free to operate its eight megawatts and if Wing Farm, see, want to connect is winged form with capacity.  
Over 20 megawatts too.  
Bossy.  
The result is given the next slides.  
This slide show, the connected of a 24 megawatts Wing Farm sea with no control.  
The plot shows, the number of overloading, our of year is 2500 18 hours.  
The capacity factor is 41.4% and the average power output exceed thermal capacity is 6.42.  
Mikvah.  
The slides show the connector of a 24 megawatts Wing found see with lu Base active control with that band, positive and negative 2%.  
We now obtain the number of only overloading our year is reduced from previous 2518.  
Our to 1930 hours the capacity for It's reduce from previous 41.4% to 34.9% and the average power output exceeds.  
The thermal capacity is reduced from 6.42 Mac, vow to 3.17, Mac bar, These slides showed the connective of a 24 megawatts of wind farm, see with AC optimal power flow, based on active control, know that Bond.  
Now, the number of overloading our a year is further reduced to 1443 hours.  
The capacity factor is further reduced to 33.4%.  
And every Power output exceeded thermal capacity, is a further reduced to 1.7 megawatts.  
this slide showed a case study on a UK generic Distribution Systems, fully HV One network, it is 33 KV over 11 KV with 61 buses and the 6dg size.  
The peak demand is 38.2, megawatts The Colony voltage control of CVC control, the parallel Transformer, and the voltage, regulator 1 DG wizard power containment and another dish.  
Ways, adaptive power factor control.  
All generally capacitors are listed in the right side of the table.  
This slide shows the voltage, simulation result minute by minute and no winged form connection to the primary 3 to 6 and 1 1 1 5.  
Plus the results show demand of for February.  
The blue plot is the voltage at the bus 1115 and a little plot is the type of position of the primary three.  
Six this slide show the frequency stimulation without meaning minute by minute.  
When all Wing Farm connected with no control, clearly the bus 1115 has frequency problem when the wind farm has no control this slide show the voltage, simulation result minute by minutes, when all Wing Farm connected with no control, clearly the voltage bus 1115 exceed up to 6% limits at 33, KV.  
The red line is the Transformer tap position.  
This slideshow, the simulator voltage for Wing farm with no containment blue or after containment green and controlled EG with DG set point.  
As you can be clearly seen that the bus 1115 has a voltage rise problem.  
When Wind Farm has no containment or voltage drop problem.  
When the G being contain with the disease that point the best control strategy for buses 115 is the DG containment.  
Now we show understand control of distribution energy, resources will require a real-time control.  
It is indeed possible and it is actually become more common around the world to do the following thermal management DG containment voltage management online.  
Tap changer However the business case needed to be clear.  
The question is, what is the aim of a controlling distributed energy resources? Do we need cheap connection for DG developer or more digits connection dno need to be seen as enabler However, technique can string all my energy by the, you know, an amazing aim is to reduce CO2 emission regardless cost or can show a city control the ER Etc.  
Thank you for watching this video, I will see you next video.  

## 3.3	Active Network Management  ANM 
In this video, we will explore the basic concept of Active network management and how to achieve network observability with the number of limited real-time measurements.  
As distribution Network are changing from passive to active due to the need of connected distribution generation.  
So far, the network have only been changing from the passive Network to see me acting Network IE The Limited DG with the connection strategy fit and forget connection of DJ as the need for increased the G connection distribution automation may be used to Is reliability, but the DG is treated as the same way as fit and forget future, or long-term distribution Network shall become smart grid.  
This will increase and improve the G.  
And the ER integration so high, you is of acid will be realized.  
one of the key motivation for development of Active network management system is the need cost effective manager, a distribution network with high renewable DG penetration and also need to create a future approved flexible and resilient Network these slides examining what the meaning of a text Network management from the different Points in USA it often called Advanced distribution automation.  
It defined the application of real-time control and a communication system to ensure the normal operation of non-passive distribution Network, however, from Wikipedia, as normal General, Viewpoint of a A & M, it described automatic control system that managing generation and load for specific purpose.  
This is usually down to keep a system parameter, voltage, power phase balance, reactive power, and frequency, within a predetermined limits, so far, no Active network management.  
Definition has been Today, I stopped it.  
This ratio what could Active network manager until it may consist of the following function.  
Active power control of the G units.  
Reactive power control of DG units, coordinate voltage control Dynamic line rating, islanding an automatic synchronization.  
For level control.  
Network topology management, as it may also, including distribution automation, the amount beside the management and storage support.  
Active, network manager Spectrum can be regarded as a from decentralized or local control to centralized or extensive control to achieve this transition, quality control of online tap changer on the network and a DG will be required.  
Decentralized control also imply, local control of our local management.  
No.  
Need to coordinate and a limited optimization centralized control need extensive measurements and a full coordination automatization, and extent control.  
This slide show how voltage control at the G side to be realize.  
This only require local measurements.  
The generator control is to avoid voltage outside limits.  
A hybrid system, may be used to carry out both power factor, and about you control to do power factor control when voltage is outside the limits, The voltage control is to keep DG voltage within the limits as show.  
In the figure.  
The top Point plot is the local load demand, the red color plot.  
The voltage at the G with construing constant power factor control is over limits.  
During the light load amount and a piccolo demand.  
The blue plot shows the voltage at DT with the voltage and the power factor control.  
Keep the voltage within the limits.  
This right? The show the advantages European management system as an example of centralized control system.  
As showing the figure, the network connects a multiple DG, at a different site.  
It also connect the storage stack VAR compensator or SVC and a full column limit our install.  
The voltage and the load control act.  
As a coordinate control to optimize the balance between d g and demand.  
This is a very complex system and require extensive communication.  
This slide show the functional requirement in distribution Network, the koala function, including Dynamic rating for level monitoring for current limit voltage, regulator, local online, tap changer, rather Advanced automatic voltage control form, a local control of HV Network.  
Activate network manager, coordinated LV voltage, regulator regulator power quality monitoring load and storage at LV Network form, a local control of Elven Network coordinate.  
Bill, both local control of HV Network and LV Network form.  
A virtual Point plant to provide the power system.  
Operation status information to the and operate and to electricity and a market trading, this will lead to determine the lecture City price, as showing this slide, active control of both HV & LV, is a very complex task, This slide shows the architecture of any and advanced distribution Management System Controller.  
The left side block are the measurements at the local substation as well as measurements from remote VAR rtu or remote terminal unit.  
Since the remote measurements are expensive.  
Only critical remote measurements may be used hence, the state.  
Technology can be employed to reduce the need of a larger number of remote measurements to implement status made with number of limited, real-time measurements, network data, pseudo, measurements, or historical measurements are considered according to the whole network of voltage.  
And frequency status, the advance the system, contractor and a control.  
Are you doing algorithm? Use the information from the state's? Amazing to provide reference setting for a b c, d g, and load shedding and VAR compensator Etc.  
This is us to achieve the fully coordinate among all this device control devices.  
This slide show how to apply the Vans distribution management system controller to a distribution network with 95 in note.  
It is only considered for real-time measurement for long local bus bar to measurable form.  
Due to remote DG side respectively, and one measurement from the worst voltage, drop point the state summation.  
Also consider pseudo measurements or historic data from the remaining 91 load the state estimation.  
Can now calculate the voltage for Load.  
This slide show the calculator voltage and a standard deviation for all, 95 nodes on the network where accuracy of measurement error of for real-time measurements is 1% and an arrow from the pseudo measurement is 50%.  
As can see from the result, the exterminate voltage standard deviation is less than 0.25 percent.  
We should have be reasonable good estimation for the voltage are all Network and note, the results are show, how we can use Sesame to reduce the number of real-time measurements.  
Thank you for watching this video.  
I show, we'll see you next video.  

## 3.4	Improving LV Network Operation with DSM
In this video, we will look how LV Network operation can be improved with demand-side management technique.  
This slides consider the understanding about the residential Road Behavior to improve LV Network operation, with demand-side management.  
We might do the following tasks to characterize the residential load type of Appliance and a power consumption.  
To measure the effectiveness of shifted passive load potential of washing group in the peak demand reduction in a real LV Network.  
And the to test the load shift in the Rio LV Network.  
For non-residential Road model.  
It is a possible to aggregate the appliance such as fridge, cooking, washing, and other Appliance in family.  
And observe the contribution of each family to the individual and aggregate data profile.  
The left side, figure show the load profile of phrygia and other Appliances kitchen washing and total for one family.  
The right side figures show the aggregate of 100 family load.  
As can see the electricity Peak usage for one family, very significantly and the aggregate load.  
Profile is more meaningful to the nro network planning.  
An operation.  
If we consider load shifting for this passive load such as washing group of load, they can be stopped during washing so they can be shift without a disturbing, the normal behavior of house hold occupants.  
Thus, this can be used to decrease the feeder Peak demand as can be seen in the figure, the washing group.  
Water can be easily shift.  
The example profile is bad for the load shifting impact.  
The following basic method was developed for nlv Network, create a new profile then I Define ocation of washing Appliance from n profile and then randomly allocate of washing a price load The simulator result were are shown in the figure on the right side as can being see, that blue color plot is the original demand, and that the green color plot is the shift, washing group demand.  
This slide shows the peak reduction will be different for different group of and load.  
As each household use the washing applies differently.  
Consider study with the methodology applied application, for three group of 100 loads we obtained, the three group result, As can be seen the plot floor, 3 figure, and a killer out the comparison.  
The peak reduction will be different if some time period are banned.  
Such as a peak in the morning as well as early evening before sleep, to understand the peak reduction distribution and the effect of time period by an 1 a.m.  
to 6 a.m.  
or 0 a.m.  
to 6 a.m.  
or 0 a.m.  
2 a.m.  
or 6 p.m.  
to 8 p.m.  
consider 100 group of n profile for each case or analyze We obtain the results as given in the table.  
The table show, the base case, I know time period band.  
For three point five, five percent of deduction for the sample of household, appliance with percentile of 0.05 and 11.3 reduction for the example of household, appliance with percentage of 0.5, the mean for all percentage.  
Is two point, thirteen percent and the standard deviation is 5.5 to however, for 6 p.m.  
to 8 p.m.  
Time band, period.  
Five point six one percent reduction folder Appliance with percent error of 0.05 and twelve point eight five percent reduction Ford, Appliance with percentage of 0.5 the mean for all % L is 13.3 2%.  
And the standard deviation is 5 point, 4 percent, the percentage reduction distribution curve our show.  
In the figure, where the green color curve calculate for 0, a.m.  
to 8 a.m.  
8 a.m.  
time period ban the brown and red color curve calculated for one am to 6m + 0.  
M2 6m, time period by respectively, the blue curve color calculate the 4-0 am and am And the pink color Cove calculator for 6 p.m.  
and 8.  
P.m.  
hours, the results, showed the ban.  
The peak time for 6 p.m.  
at the APM using washing will result in the biggest Peak reduction to 13.3 2% Let's unlock that the load shifting organism being applied to over a LV distribution network from the northwest of England own.  
And operated by electricity, Northwest limited.  
The subject has the following feature five, feeder, 334 customer and eight kilometer lines.  
As you can see from the figure 5 feeder our plot with the five different color, blue light, blue green, pink.  
And the black respectively.  
This runs show in particular, load shift algorithm with a peak period.  
The band is applied over each network of feeder a powerful.  
Oh before and after load shift is carried out, the figure in the left shoulder example for the one feeder before load shift and the figure on the right show, 40 percent of peak reduction after apply.  
Did the load to shift our when compared the 3D plot between these two figure, the peak of current and the are reduced from about 30 73 in the left, figure to 60 in the life.  
To analyze the distribution of the peak reduction for each feeder.  
The network is assimilate with 1,000 different group of your load.  
The table in the right show that the peak reduction vary from 5 feeder on the percentage of 0.05, by the peak of production are very closed for five feet on the percentage of 0.5.  
these results show that washing grouper can be indeed, use to reduce the peak feed, demand, In summary.  
Dynamic pricing is a key element.  
In many demand, the side and management scheme contractor.  
Because based power availability and frequency of interruption could tell meant also exist.  
Viability of DSM.  
Skin, depending on the target load, this our small-scale consumer more in number limited, elasticity.  
Extensive infrastructure value has been clear.  
And a single differently, the median to the larger scale commercial and Industrial consumer, less than the number efficiency.  
Origin, nated less infrastructure note, the lacked customer involvement voltage a based DSM.  
Skiing could be an alternative to the no, but this has a limitation Thank you very much for watching this video.  
I will see you next video.  

## 3.5	Demand Side Management Techniques
In this video, we will look at various demand side management technology.  
We were then exam, how demand side management technology can be deployed through a brief review of to dno project capacity to customer C to C and a customer load active system service clasp.  
Project.  
Aim demand, Asylum management or DSM.  
Taken in the egg is to provide Verity of measurement to reduce energy consumption has have a more manageable demand.  
The DSM technique can control Demand by using direct load control load the limit Agreed commercial and Industrial program frequency regulation, considered time-of-use pricing or demand the bidding, smart metering and Appliance Etc.  
The figure in the right side show, how a base case to compare the peak shaving technique or conservation efficiency technique by law.  
Voltage reference or load shifting technique by consider demand related pricing.  
This slideshow demand-side management options DSM.  
Also demand response are option or strategy developed for the effective means of modify the con Suma demand to cut cost mosa application aim to reduce Capital expenditures some DSM option Peak shaving very filling Peak clipping and shaving for dno DSM, should be classified into three category.  
Director control of load dno control, customer load or generation.  
Local load control, self-adjustment to limit a peak demand three distribution, loader control dno.  
Send a real-time pricing of signal.  
The figure in the right side show.  
How this option may be deployed for control daily 24 hours.  
This rise is a typical refer to a customer adopt its consumption to the electricity price.  
Customer can do the following reducing consumption during Peak price or shifting consumption for hours with a high pricing to our with low price.  
Overloaded option in the electricity consumed due to a high price.  
what this until neither Dynamic a price or time, varying price, need to inform customer for the awareness and finally, to facilitate, the customer to have ability to adapt consumption manually or automatically The time-of-use pricing is commonly used in many country Peak or off-peak, Price or economic 7.  
UK, it is a contract based and near real time.  
Normally larger can zoom has commercial or industrial consider.  
Time-of-use has been around for years and works.  
It is enough for low-carbon technology integration demand during the peak pricing period can now very significantly in the worst case scenario.  
IE actually or cold weather or n, minus one condition could be managed better.  
The ratio of a peek of price are typically small.  
And new type of production and the consumption result in a new load pattern.  
The report impact evaluation of aren't our Roux time-of-use rated first, the year analysis in November 2013 conclude for the domestic use there is a load of Shifting but the limited saving and to probably due to relatively small difference between I'm Peak or off-peak Uprising.  
In other words to make a time of using to work more effectively.  
In other word to make time using to work on more effectively.  
The margin difference between on Peak and off-peak older be needed.  
Another demand, the son of management technique is considered further part a service providers as also known as aggregator which manages thousand or millions of a customer.  
Dnot SO2 not require the SM implementation but the service or IE middleman between customer and dno or TSO contractor are between customer and aggregator.  
However, it has faced some challenges similar to those aggregate storage.  
For example, Depends over.  
Millions customer.  
Might not good for local service.  
Also, I information communication technology, become very challenge.  
this slide lists the existing measure of skin and the potential measure skin existing measure skin including Big consumer DSM, contractor for this connections time of use tariff, economic 7 do metering.  
Critical Peak pricing small customer to in Canada or in USA domestic servant smart meter time of use commercial industrial Time of use aggregate provide a service to TSO balancing energy reserves for Century meter skin, including smart.  
Appliance Reacting to pricing from smart meter Grand, you time of user tariff, energy management system Home Building Etc, smart, Appliance, provide a service automatically, encouraging manager of a specific technology such as Evie.  
I'll coordinate management of Summer management system such as building EMS system and home EMS system.  
This slideshow demand side management in, he nwl capacity to customer.  
C2C project problem, distribution Network, operated dno faith in some part of circuit congestion problem.  
Particularly during a contingency of Jane incentive investment deferral.  
Policy have e n WL.  
C, 2 C project including the following consideration.  
Contractor DSM service from our big customers.  
A using aggregator.  
And oh no joke for different service.  
I demand the shifting.  
I don't lock incentive 2,000 pounds per month for one megawatts of availability.  
And to pumper, kilowatts to manage circuit congestion problem.  
C2C project, derived Eno to become more and more like DSO, not t and all.  
How does this affect DSO or energy supplies? The customer load active systems class project is another DSM example.  
But using existing distribution asset capacity, the scope of class including investing, how reduce or increase voltage on the distribution Network can reduce a peak demand and increase the amount when needed to provide a service to National Grid.  
To pop stagger within the Paulo Transformer, using reactive power capability, through the use of circulating, current to provide a service to National Grid and the three try to consider only primary substation 33.  
KV 2 11 KV or 6.6 KV Thank you for watching this video, I will see you next video.  

## 3.6	Smart Metering
In this video, we will look at the role of smart meeting and its application.  
This slide show the traditional electricity meter for domestic customer meter, being read by a manual procedures regularly or occasionally, which were depending on the cost to the utility customer, build for the electricity consumption time of use tariff, the traditionally, with 2 meter, or counter acting actively During different time of the day.  
Aye, aye, economic survey in the UK.  
This ratio a layout, a smart meter with the communication capability the price and a tariff settlement can be manager and change charged under the user control, however, only beneficial for the user who are not only the lecture seeking Sumer, but I have the capability to carry out electricity production and Storage.  
This ratio the role of a smart meter, which provide automatic reading consumption to the DNA low, or a data concentrator via the teller communication link dno provide a provisional or price to the customer with our ahead nearly real-time smart meter are a number of demand side management.  
The Gateway for customer and a market and essentially device for smart Appliance price to tno and dno signals.  
This rise to show the smart meter business case in different country in Italian, due to the energy theft.  
The DNR already looker, a new generation of meter and cleverly way of using the data in Sweden.  
Manual metering is expensive.  
The nro looking at new generation of meter and clever way of using the To to recur expense.  
In the UK government, or the, like, to understand energy cost for the pricing control and Empower customer towards the smart Grid.  
In March 2014, government published over the period.  
2030 the installation smart meter will be provide Sixpoint building pound net benefits to the UK.  
The programming will cost ten point, nine billion pong and provide 17 1.1 billing in the benefits.  
This slideshow smart meter deployment in the UK, since March 2011? 11, three-point building.  
Pong announcement will be spent in the place 53 million gas and electric meter.  
Which are expected to deliver total benefits of 18.6 billing over the next 20 years.  
Most householder will have a smart meter installed in their Energy company between 2015 and 2020.  
UK, smart meter owned by editing, Supply, not dno.  
Central data or concentrator can be found in www, smart DCC, UK website, no pseudo measurement and a real-time information for dno become real.  
this ratio a common smart meter requirement or gas electricity meter with a smart functionality, including A in-home display for domestic customer.  
Wide area, network module to connect the central Communication provider, a home area network to link different meter within customer Primacy.  
This slide shows a smart meter, some function requirements.  
All electricity meter, and domestic gas meter should be required, to have a functionality to supply remote in enablement.  
And this ability meant of Supply home area network, should use open standard and a protocol.  
So, as to achieve interoperability and enable Innovation by equipment manufacturer Should have a losses of Supply alert function to alert Supply and a network.  
When a consumer electricity Supply is lost.  
This will help protect the work operate to respond to outage effectively and quickly meet the sisters show have data.  
Stored, at least 12 months over, half our consumption data to benefit the customer and Or mode the competition in both retailer Supply and Energy Service Market.  
The table in this slideshow, the higher level function narrative for the electricity and a gas meter.  
For example, function, a both electricity and a gas meter.  
Sure.  
Have a remote provisional of accuracy.  
Reading information for defined.  
The time period function e, only electricity meter short.  
Have a load management capability to deliver.  
Among the side of the managed with ability to remote control electricity load, for more sophisticated control of device, in the home function.  
T e is not required for gas meters.  
In summary, business case is fundamental to adopt the technology dno Supply typically to reduce operational expenditure ope X and a smart meter are enabler for smart grid depend on granularity of the data flow minutes to our Market, the interruption in our a minute for dno.  
And TSO real-time Network management, neither larger volume of data, reliability of communication.  
Monitor of anything of power losses Supply voltage and add Eno provide a real-time Network management.  
Finally management of data and data concentrate dno executor using the data for offline Network planning and a more desirable for real-time Network management.  
But the challenge is the real time data latency and a cost.  
Thank you very much for watching this video.  
I will see you next video.  

## 3.7	Integration Challenges
This video will examine benefits and challenge for the integration of DG.  
We will understand what main fact limit the G integration.  
This slide show the main type of distribution generation in megawatts according to National greatest.  
Seven-year statement in 2011 as can sing that the current generation consists of 33 percent of wing.  
Seven percent of biofuel 10% of Chip, the 22% of coal oil, gas 5% of other renewable.  
Fishing, we should expect an another seven-year statement from National Grid in this year, 2018, as also can see that UK has installed significant.  
When generation the availability or the intermittency of the wind generation, will have a significant impact on the G integration to the UK and network this slide show.  
Conquering scenario as can be seen that Wing from about 2.2, gigawatts in 2012 to about 6.3 Giggles in 2032.  
Another significant growth is bio mass generation from about 1.9 gigawatts to about to full point 2 gigawatts.  
This slides to show that UK install generation capacity, was 85 gigawatts by 2014.  
The in 2014 the total production was about 336.  
Taylor was our Peak demand was 60 gigawatts consumption was 360 teller was our PV generation was about eight, gigawatts Wing generation was about 13, gigawatts and the number of EV were about 43,000.  
In the UK, the overall PV capacity is 7 point 7 5, gigawatts one of the largest market in Europe more than seven hundred.  
Twenty thousand PV generation install with the PV power rating from 1 kilowatt to five megawatts.  
Typically domestic install with PV power rating from 1 Point 5 to 3.  
Point 5 kilowatts per house engineering recommendation.  
TI-83 describes for one phase 16 ampere phase.  
And the power rating is up to three point six eight kilowatts for three phase.  
Power rating is up to 7.04 kilowatts, the power factor is 0.95, inductive or capacity.  
Developer of DG technology, mainly focus on the cost reduction and how to deploy DG increase in connection of the G.  
Well course energy production displacement for the conventional plant as DG are not desire to provide the system support, increasing deployment of the Geo connection on the fit and forget policy.  
Began to create operation problem.  
This slides present the benefits and the challenge of DT integration benefits, including a increased Network asset utilization, assess, displacement and tnd investment defer, enhanced reliability and security early DG deployment.  
Helping meeting.  
Renewable Target, the Challenger 4dg integration, including the need.  
For wide area, information, communication, control infrastructure, increase, complicity, and at the cost.  
The question are the benefits greater than cost.  
This slide show how DG integration can defer Network investment case.  
One, neither circuit can Supply Group demand, a long necklace solution required for continued compliance.  
Hence install, an additional circuit is needed case to install a sufficient generation.  
Say 50, megawatts assume the generator limited to 6.  
Scent of its capacity.  
Hands up to 30 megawatts contribution available with the G install.  
The original networker is adequate.  
Digi Supply to their local load can reduce networker losses significantly.  
However reduction in transmission and distribution.  
Losses will depend on the G penetration level at a high penetration level loss.  
Could be increase impact of install micro CHP on distribution.  
Losses could be very significantly since the average distribution losses.  
UK are approximately 7% also, could it be as a high as 20% at a peak? However, current there is no a proper rate framework for micro CHP to realize this benefits.  
This slides to show the electric circuit price, see this including connection charge use of a system charge transmission distribution losses, reactive power support charge and reliability and service quality charge.  
This light show the difference in charge between son, Cho generation and DT for accessing Network.  
As it can be seen that, the traditional electricity pricing is no longer.  
The case in the UK, this is a very challenged problem.  
Now let's calculate a voltage drop and the rise problem with consideration of DG question is the 11 KV feeder in the figure has the voltage at Target at secondary of the substation, set of to 11 Point.  
2 2 KV load is eight megawatts 0-9 capacity.  
A factor, a combined heat and power plant, inject 15 VA, with unit power factor.  
The question is, is the voltage at the bus to within statutory limits.  
Nicolette losses.  
And the question to would the voltage is still be okay.  
During minimum demand is 30% of the peak.  
Answer to one sings V1 equal to 1.0 to per unit.  
The load SL equal to 8, megawatts plus 3.87, Mac bar CHP equal to minus a 50 MV backwards, and SB base equal to 100 MVA.  
As we know, Delta V equal to V1, minus V2.  
Equal to Open brackets.  
C h, p+ p.  
Close brackets.  
Multiply R minus Q multiplied by X over V1 equal to Open brackets.  
CHP of 15, megawatts, plus load of eight Mega Watts.  
Black bracket multiplied line resist our of 0.3 over 100 v.  
Ay minus Q of 3.87 multiply X of zero point.  
1 over 100 MPA over V1 of 1.02.  
We obtain 1 Point, 1 Point, O 2 minus V2.  
Equal to minus 0.02 for hands V2 equal to 1.0 for for per unit.  
Changing the demand of s power, minimum of 30%, of eight megawatts and reactive power Q equal to, 30% of 3.8, Mac bar.  
We now have Delta V equal to V 1, minus V 2 equal to 30%.  
P multiplied.  
Our 30 % zq x x over V1 equal to Open Bracket, CHP of -15, Mac was plus 30% of Eight megawatts, close brackets.  
Multiplier are of 0.3 over 100 MVA.  
30% of 3.87 multiply X of zero point.  
1 over 100, MVA over 1.  
V1 of 1.02 we obtained.  
V2 equal to 1.0 58 per unit.  
This is okay as it is still on the 6%.  
Thank you very much for watching this video.  
I will see you next video.  

## 3.8	DG Impacts and Challenges
In this session, we will focus on technical issue of low-carbon Technology integration.  
First of all, we will review the impact of DG integration on distribution Network, operation protection and control.  
So we will describe how demand side management may be used to control d g or load respond to achieve the benefits by different network investment.  
We will also introduce Active network management technology technique and a demonstrate how to maximize integration of low-carbon Technologies, to distribution Network.  
In this session, I will covering for topic DG integration and the challenge smart metering demand side, the management Active network management.  
Firstly, we will need to understand that the impact of DG on a wide range of technical challenge, including reverse power flow, for level changing, increase complicity of protection.  
Power quality strip Excel.  
We will also exam The benefits and a challenge for integration of DG.  
The smart metering will be one of important technology to make the real-time measurement possible for better managing.  
Integration of low-carbon Technology, we will look how we managing and maximize the integration of low-carbon Technology through demand-side management Active network management demands under management is the method to manage the balance between energy production and load respond.  
Dynamically Active network management is the method to managing and maximize integration of low-carbon Technology into the network.  
In this video, we will mainly understand the impact of DG integration on distribution Network, operational protection and the control.  
In this slide we will look the diver of distribution generation from environment, Commercial National regulate Viewpoint environment to use of renewable energy and low-carbon Technology to limit ghg emission.  
Avoid construction of new transmission circuits and a larger generating plant from commercial, General uncertainty, electricity Market, favoring small generation schemes, cost-effectively round to improve power, quality and reliability from National regulatory diversification of energy.  
so sources and a competition policy, As a way, should already know that DG technology exists.  
Very 80s.  
Such as wing power.  
Combined heat, power fossil fuel-based micro CHP biomass small Hydro photovoltaic.  
I concentrated solar power geothermal wave and tied way power Etc.  
They will cause many Challenge and a technical issue.  
During the integration of this technology.  
Into the power Network, the main technique issue between envy and HIV distribution.  
That one may consider differently for Amy distribution Network 11 KV or 33 KV the main issue.  
Our voltage rise rule area.  
Overhead Network.  
Increase the short circuit level.  
In urban area on the ground.  
Power quality are lending protection, increase and edging losses and very ability for HV distribution.  
That work at 132 KV, the main issue of thermal limits, stability and reserve requirements.  
Variability.  
As you can see from this slice, the traditional distribution system is one way, power flow from Upstream to the customer in the downstream distribution system.  
With the G in the right side has changing the power flow from passive to active, IE bidirectional power flow, this bring many challenge.  
Technical issue in relation to the power Network, operation for attaching control, maintenance and Etc.  
This slide show that the DJ impact on a voltage rise as can be seen from this figure.  
The red and the blue color curves are the voltage job for both MV & LV feeder at a minimum load and a masculine load condition respectively for the allow voltage variation for the DG integration is very As we know the voltage will rise @dg connection point in order to keep the voltage within the statutory voltage.  
Limit on the minimal load, condition, allow voltage, rise for DG is very small or only small did, you can be integrated into the network unless there's some other one control method or to be used DG impact.  
Also affected, the power quality can be categorized into general term describing impact on the voltage.  
Wave shape.  
Our one frico repetitive short-term, IMS voltage variation too deep or sag single events were touching in RMS voltage, three harmonics.  
Repetitive Distortion of a voltage wave exaggerate.  
Impact on DJ maybe increase or lower power quality particular issue.  
Associated with the wind turbine flick and a power electronic based technology might lead to more harmonics.  
This slideshow five minutes, average 24 hours, total harmonic Distortion profile for residential customer in one of he and W.  
El l v sub station with for feeder connected to 70 custom must and the 28 have a PV system.  
The measurement was taken on tongue.  
oppa 2012, DG impact, also calls the reduction of for level changes since all director, connected spinning electrical machine contribute to for a short circuit level synchronize machine, contributed to sustained fold or colored induction machine, contribute only to Transit And three phase fault current.  
However, for level contribute floor converter or Power Electronics is in January much smaller, or negligible or so-called low initial system.  
DG impact on protection will be significant as see from this Slide.  
The fault current are the substance can be reduced significantly due to the G1 G2 and G3, contribution to the fault, current, the measure month from G1 and G2 and G3 will be necessary, which increase the complexity and cost for the Touching.  
The similar in this lies, the distance protection for Zoom Wang setting may be okay, but for Zone 2.  
Ranging setting will be reduced due to the DG contribution to the four colored.  
DG impact, also reflect on the system stability for induction generator voltage.  
Stability is important.  
Why for synchronous generator, angular, stability is main issue.  
If embedded, the plant become a significant part of generation, then changing the sea is ability, become important, my operation of loss of Maine.  
Relay not acceptable as it will danger to the embedded generation.  
Also, we now need to find a way to maintain the stability problem, or false, either increased speed of protection, reactive power injection or fast generate control.  
These slides show the power losses for the generation when output power small, the generation losses is high.  
The generator output power can reach an optimal and to manager, so many embedded generator.  
To have the optimum power output is very complex problem.  
The wind doesn't blow when we want to turn the lights on.  
The question is what extent can renewable supply to the demand? The variability of the deity has a significant impact on the network Energy Management Systems.  
So did I this size to show the matching renewable? Electricity generation with in demand in the UK 2006 diversify of resources and the corresponding Geographic dispersion improved matching the hour-by-hour demand There will be many our in year where the wing and a wave tidal power, and not enough to meet demand.  
Thus the balance of a convention generation is needed.  
The strong interconnection transmission will reduce the need local balance and generation and a well increase the reliability demand the side of management and active distribution.  
Network will make it impossible for renewable to supply, higher volume of demand.  
Thank you very much for watching this video.  
I will see you next video.
